2. To undertake projects and programs that work directly towards eliminating drugs and illegal performance enhancing substances from the sport.
Her publishing credits include the books Grace for the Race: Meditations for Busy Moms and Mothers of the Bible (both with Barbour), compilations such as Chicken Soup for the Sister’s Soul Woman’s World and HomeLife, and tips for Working Mother, Family Circle and Parenting.
- Cut tofu in to 1x1x2 “and fry until golden brown. Put the fried tofu aside.
If I had the opportunity to live in only peace, I’d take it–or I would have, before I knew Christ. But now that I know Him, I know something I never imagined: God, who is love and therefore has a natural ease to be joyful all the time, took the sorrow of the cross to die for our sins. He didn’t have to do that. But He came down to our world of mixed-up messes and all the gray we complain is between the black & white.
1807
You can understand my dilemma.
- S$14 for children (aged between 2 – 12 years)
I think it is important that we always help others before ourselves!! Although we are faced with costs of our own adoption and charities we know that we can ALWAYS do a little more. Beth and her crew at Give 1 Save 1, really designed a great opportunity for families to reach out and help one home!!
Though Americas Press is focused on POD paperback short print runs, they do also produce hardback, plasti-coil books, saddle-stitch books, brochures and various support materials.
The format of this book makes it easy to read and find just what you’re looking for, bypassing what doesn’t apply to your current skin issue. You’ll find 77 rules for skin care, including:
Mitchell now wears the bullet on a chain around his neck which has been lodged inside his leg more than 40 years
Ken Russell (Whore)
"Oh, Matthew..." I said in distress, my voice catching. "Right in the-the middle? That's...not...r-right!"
1. List Seven Things That Make You Awe-Summm!
In my early teens at school, my art teacher told everyone that yes, Bridget could draw very realistically but that wasn't "art". She made me feel that I had to start over, if not stop altogether.
The arrests were made at a time when the state police were anticipating increased Maoist violence in the state, especially in areas bordering Orissa and Chhattisgarh.
The Bearfighter is just bummed because critics have largely let this film off the hook, and in my mind, it’s because newspapers are failing and this is going to be a big part of their lives for 3 more films (yes 3, not 2). If you shit on Hunger Games now, you miss out on years of coverage that will attempt to keep newspapers in business (like the new pay portal on LA Times? thought so). They shouldn’t have pulled so many punches. It was “good” like mid-priced bourbon. It wasn’t a mind-blower, which the book clearly was.
Let’s start by talking about the book. Hemlock is the first in a planned trilogy – did you always see yourself writing a series, or did the world and story evolve as you wrote Hemlock?
Well, friends, I'm going there again. As you know, I am a Founding Consultant with Clever Container and we have a few mottos that I am all too proud to repeat. One is "Organizing Just Got Fun", and the other is "It's Not Just the Products, it's the Process"
That may be too drastic a cut even for the civil service but a target to reduce it by a third over five years by natural attrition, getting rid of incompetent, lazy staff and very selective and prudent hiring is possible.
This being said, I never buy belts. I have been wearing the same brown, black, and white belts for years. I bought them all on sale at one time or another.
Aside from the sheer beauty of these creatures they are said to be a symbol of messages about the nature of illusion. They ask you to look at your own life and realize what is truth and what are the illusions you have created that restrict your actions/ideas and keep you from realizing your goals.
To assemble the tart (which you should do no more than a few hours before you plan to serve it) cut the tops off of the strawberries and dot the tart shell with them flat side down, points up, about a quarter inch apart. Pour the lemon cream over the top and chill for at least an hour.
wolves came out of the shadows and nuzzled my palms. i rested in
1½ tsp Double action baking powder
Remember, the Organization of Islamic Countries is dedicated to preventing anyone, anywhere in the world from commenting negatively about Islam, so they would literally eliminate our free speech and there were clearly conversations held that implied that the U.S. Justice Department would begin to enforce censorship against American citizens to protect radical Islam
I then organized all the digital files on my external hard drive. By year, then month then event. It feels good knowing one of the things that is so very, very important to me is nice and organized now.
2 upper
The setup, as I read it: the narrator’ brother was apparently once conflicted toward him as a result of his gayness. Now that his own son is displaying queer mannerisms, he’s forced to do “penance” and provide a protection that he never afforded his brother. To further complicate this family dynamic, in this "waltz", both brothers, straight and gay, come to the painful realization that they are both limited in the ways they can parent this young queer child. Here’s the opening:
First you barely escape your shotgun wedding to cool-guy sperm-trust Levi Johnston.
to keep the land and refused welfare.
“I accept your terms,” she said, rashly.
Danny and I introduced ourselves to Darlene, we hugged, and she called Bobby over. We had a chance to talk for a second and Bobby thanked us for blogging about Melt Mobile and his show. COOL! Back to reality, though. We gave Darlene our order: two Originals (plain) with bacon, sautéed onions, mushrooms, and tomatoes. A few minutes later we had our sandwiches. They were cheesy and nice n’ crunchy like grilled cheese should be! The ingredients were fresh off the grill – the crispy bacon added a nice texture, the onions great flavor, and the tang of the fresh tomato and the earthiness of the mushrooms balanced the buttery/cheesy goodness out. Seriously amazing grilled cheese…we will DEFINITELY come back whenever possible!
And, the brightest sun draped in azure silk
Power Points: 2
Level of Tsundere: a Junior Frosty that’s been out in the sun
Oh Saviour, make us like Thyself; we wish not so much to do, as to be. If
I am not writing a ‘rule’ here, just a personal observation and conclusion.
Now, if you are looking for the winner and top three, you'll have to pop back tomorrow. Because of the blogger probs, I allowed an extra day for entries, so do come by in the morning to see who won what!!
Sencha Green, Wild Encounter, Pai Mu Tan, Persian Pomegranate, and Egyptian Mint… We also have Chamomile Citrus, Sapphire Earl Grey and Kenilworth Ceylon.
-1 CAN PINK ALASKAN SALMON (THIS WILL MAKE 4 SMALL CAKES,DOUBLE IF YOU WANT MORE)
The chippie birds are Dusty Attic. I cut off about 1/3 of the row of birds and inked them in Tim Holtz Distress Ink in Black Soot. The "branch" is a stripped Prima Summer Carnation Vine and splattered it with white acrylic paint. Well you get the picture I'm sure ;)
So, as I continue to have the sensation of being 'zombiefied' and have this incredible urge to watch the video, "Thriller", by Michael Jackson, I patiently await for the special effects, sorry, side effects, such as feeling noxious, lethargic, anxious, depressed and breathless, to finally subside.
That is it, no other new things in the works. I will work on taking better photos to share and I hope to have the necklaces made up this weekend to share with you all.
Irne Jacob and Jean Louis-Trintignant at the top of their game in this intricate tale of lives governed by fate and numeracy. Possibly the most magnificent directorial swansong ever. Watch it and weep at the fact that Kieslowski left us way too soon.
Convert to Most Formats
The branches of Birth and Death had it rough. People did often take offense to the Life agents who checked on them, but to assassinate one of them was far more rare than agents from rest of the department. Death agents got knocked off sometimes, but their cases would be taken up by others while the assassin was tracked down. Assassins got neither a year nor six months to make up for their crime when they were caught. Some confessed, screamed a speech or two for the media to pick up about how the world had gone wrong, screamed all the way to the final door and beyond.
Your miracles shine through
At the bottom of the Online version of the story, the Mail invited readers to comment, but strangely, given the emotive content, only one person, the imaginatively named Bob Roberts from Worcester, had left one, obediently parroting the mail's "OOOH they are such nasty Nazis!!" line
Anyway...I have to admit that I have not even had time to read your blogs, and I apologize for that. I hope that each and every one of you is doing well in your lives, and I promise to return to blogging as usual in May. Also, even though I am not a huge fan of FaceBook, I have been able to stay more current on there (as some of you know), so for those of you who are also on FB, feel free to look me up (Melanie Knutson) and stay in touch that way for right now.
2 Kings 4: 1 – 7 – The Widow’s Olive Oil
Great music, great director, great film. This movie meanders through the unforgiving landscape of the civil war (which the main characters seem completely ambivalent to), and somehow makes all three of the protagonists Blondie (the good), Angel Eyes (the bad), and Tuco (the ugly) seem likable. The films final climactic scene, is probably the best finish in movie history.
My current wondering came up with regard to the CUC’s Active Democracy Study Group Task Force Members.
I’m also away for the next few weeks but there’ll still be some interesting blog posts to read right here, about work happening within CMDHB and in the community. Also, if you haven’t already seen them, Jonathon Gray’s started a blog called Transformation Essentials, while our ELT yesterday started a ‘Team Counties’ blog to tell you more each week about the work they’re doing to help us become the best healthcare system in Australasia by 2015.
Emma smiled ruefully. “Better be checkin’ on Mamm before we get settled. No doubt she’s been stirrin’ the pot over here amongst all the women, and she might just walk right out of the service when she sees that Dat’s stayed home. You let me know if there’s anything I can do to help, Abby.”
Well it has been a very long time between drinks, as I waited for a suitable, appropriate, telling, devastatingly insightful (you get the picture) moment to celebrate blog the one thousandth number.
So much for “lazy” Greeks. Moreover, the average annual wage of a Greek worker is 73 percent that of the German average, despite the cliché of the pampered, overpaid Greek trotted out at every opportunity.
If you're not so good with the needle and thread, iron on adhesives and fabric glue are great alternatives to explore. They're also great tool if you can handle your needle and thread. Use it to hold fabric in place while you sew, make your own appliques, and a dozen other uses I'm sure you can come up with. I like to keep some iron on adhesive tape in my sewing kit, though I also keep a sheet or two on hand for appliques.
He: No! Why are you even asking?
- In English, so far she has said mama, dada, Braylee, ball, no, uh-oh, bye bye, hello, more, bottle, so big, one, and maybe some others that I can't remember at the moment. She definitely is understanding a lot more of what we say too. She is following a lot of directions in English now.
Faith
Also, it goes without saying- I don’t know everything…don’t ask me the stuff your two-year old is asking you, like “How did God get here in the first place?” and “How come everything isn’t perfect?” I might try to answer and make a real fool out of myself, but you wouldn’t want that, now would you?
Today, unexpectedly, I was reminded of what we lose.
Jalan Jenderal Sudirman,
I would ask him if he was as excited as I was
Leave the menus on the screen permanently until turned off again
I foresee things that they’ve usually missed and I have to explain things that most people take for granted all.the.time.
This spot could have gone to MasterChef Australia (which should now totally be called Adult MasterChef Australia just to make it sound creepy), but Junior MasterChef had more likeable contestants, it didn’t clog up the schedule with non-stop 24 hour coverage, and it’s food looked just as spectacular. Even for those viewers who complained about the supposed “meanness” of MasterChef would find it hard to fault the grade schoolers of Junior MasterChef. The only downside, hating reality show contestants is a signature of the genre but hating on kids feels kind of mean, even if they deserve it.
"You mean for $75, you'll attach a basket of fruit to my head and somehow get it to dance. It sounds like fun, but I was just looking for a haircut."
So can some please tell me exactly why we need to import record numbers of immigrants into Canada each and every year? Seriously! If I am supposed to surrender my country to succeeding waves of de facto colonizers then at least give me a legitimate reason why I should embrace this unwanted fate.
In addition to these new irritants, Dead Souls is plagued by issues familiar to the series, including endless pages of text dialogue and frequent loading screens. In a lethargic opening similar to Yakuza 4, I was more than an hour into the Dead Souls and had barely moved my character more than a few dozen feet.
I am going to try and do some stitching tonight or in the morning :@ It is autumn here, and the morning and nights are getting much cooler and crisp! So spending much less time outside. Really need to get the fire going.
Nivagra -narayana –nivagra
We’d like to help you make that picture come true."
The winners should get in touch with me using the email address at my website:
Start every day with a smile and get it over with. ~W.C. Fields
I hope you've enjoyed my long and winding explanation, or, at least, that you didn't die of boredom. Happy New Year, my dear friends! Happy New Year, Margaret, wherever you are! Please give my regards to Mr. Dickens, and to the Dillinger Gang.
The colors? Delicate shades that nothing can chip or fade.
Hannah's been very fortunate to take a number of enrichment classes: karate, pottery, Spanish, swimming, soccer, tennis, ballet, tap and art. It's the first time that she's come away with such disappointment. While disappointment is a part of life, it's just a shame that her first sewing experience was such a letdown. Hopefully when she's a bit older we can try sewing classes again.
A severe drought ravaged the Horn of Africa last year, causing food shortages that claimed the lives of tens of thousands of people in Somalia and led to the declaration of famine by the UN in six areas of the country. At the height of the crisis, 750,000 people in the Horn of Africa were at risk of death.
Bingo-rama, I thought. I had him now. I had to squelch the Chesire grin from forming between my thighs. The very thought of him in my net made all four of my limbs tingle.
Currently, she lives with her daughter, mother and a rambunctious German Shepherd named Reuben, in the beautiful state of New Mexico.
It tastes weird. Intense perfume pervades the whole thing and makes it hard to get at the beeriness beneath. I can just about detect the peat, and the roast barley is present on the finish. There's possibly a bit of chocolate buried in there too, but overall it's quite difficult to take. Still, I suppose when it's €10 for half a litre you don't want to be charging through it. I'm not at all sure I'd buy another bottle, and the price is only part of the reason.
Oh, and it's alright, it's all right, it's all right
I have written before about finding the time for current friends so that they won't become the friends you forget. (see Find the Time) But if you do grow apart with a close friend, I think that it is an awful shame. In situations like these, there is no one to blame because it is one of those things that just happens. I often think about the good times I have had and sometimes I feel sadness, frustration and annoyance when I think of a friend I used to hang out with but I can't either recall their name or picture their face. I try to avoid this happening again (thank you Facebook) but it's still hard. There is only so much you can say to someone you haven't spoken to in years.
with no fingers to grasp for more than i’ve been given
“Deschutes Brewing Red Chair IPA* (Bomber 1 pt 6 oz). Beautiful orange amber color with a foamy beige/orange head (aggressively poured). Correct pine-citrus smell. Dry from the start and definitely hop driven but (as the label claims) not overly bitter. Despite a relatively low 6.4% abv there is a warming characteristic here. I didn’t originally like IPA’s when I began paying attention to beer. Now I find I like IPA’s if the abv is within a reasonable range and even if a particular IPA isn’t something I like, I can now at least tell if it’s a faithful representation of the style. Red Chair IPA is both: it’s a great beer and it represents the IPA style. Another hit for Deschutes!”
Friday morning I am empty.
There is a clear, direct message to not only hold our own light and space, but also that of humanity and earth in your hands. There is a symbolic theme of light, fire, and a harking back to creation and magic. Like a kind of ‘alchemic activation’, we are being drawn to do what feels natural to us and it is working on such a powerful etheric level. Sacred keys are being turned and tuned as divining forks, with secret symbols and coding to be revealed, dna to be activated, and the curtain preparing to draw open, like a grande theatre of the truth that exists in our hearts. And we are on the stage of earth waiting for the next Divine acts to unfold.
Faithful God. Always working behind the scenes.
And yet, do we approach Him as a dad? Most of us have never even considered Him on these terms. We just think of Him as “the Big Guy in the sky”, or “the Man upstairs”. Often we think of Him as “the Punisher”, watching and waiting for an opportunity to smite us, but the more one contemplates this concept of God as our dad, the more sense it makes.
“Tested my parents at every turn, Sam,” came the bishop’s spritely reply. “But none of this second-guessin’ solves our present problem, does it? Four hundred folks here, and a feast prepared. And a bride in hiding.”
Well, Mr. King you certainly hit the nail on the head considering that it was you that allowed our ex-PM Gordon Brown to empty the gold bullion out of the vaults of the Bank of England and send it over to the EU.
During Marable's Cuba sojourn, he met many government officials, intellectuals and community leaders who as well as having a lengthy conversations with Assata Shakur aka Joanne Chesimard an escaped terrorist cop killer from the U.S.
I’m sorry, but I have to say it… I’m tired of Danny McBride’s “Danny McBride” bit. I like Eastbound and Down well enough, but isn’t that character a little overdone at this point? Swardson too. You can’t really call it “acting” at this point, can you? It’s just this weird character he does where he’s full of crazy, perv bravado…. Oh… and he’s an inept moron. When he did it in Tropic Thunder, it was fresh and hilarious. 3 years later, he needs to come up with a new bit, and I’ll be honest and say that he personally reduced the score and grade of this movie.
I drank too much last night, I got bills to pay, my head just feels in pain. I missed the bus & there’ll be hell to pay,I’m late for work again. And if I’m even there they’ll all imply, that I might not last the day. And then you call me and it’s not so bad, it’s not so bad.
Uncooking: Intro. to Raw Food
Nawab Khan, president of the Bhopal Gas Peedit Mahila Purush Sangharsh Morcha, demanded that the IOA must immediately tell IOC that it will not accept Dow Chemical’s money. “It is a matter of national shame that the IOA and Mr. Malhotra have succumbed to the temptation of American dollars and ignored the fact that these dollars are coming from a company responsible for death and poisoning of thousands of Indian citizens,” he said.
I think it would sell.
Living on less is not necessarily lesser living. Pity is not the same as compassion. Inflicting suffering on ourselves out of guilt at the suffering of others is somewhat less useful than addressing the existing suffering and seeking to help in simple, direct and meaningful ways.
See HPANWO Links column for the website of Ian R Crane, including the Shift 2 pages. Here’s a direct link to the event I’m reviewing here: http://www.ianrcrane.co.uk/index.php?act=viewProd&productId=350
Contrary to popular wisdom, my job is not to set limits. I don't have to restrict their exploration or make judgments about their choices or set curfews or punish them for transgressions against my arbitrary rules. Instead, my job is to work with them to recognize the principles that we all want to live by, principles of trust, respect, honor, legality, and good manners. My job is to support them, to listen, to be available, and, yes, to arrange transportation. My job is to offer resources and time and nuggets and—rarely—a shoulder when one of them discovers she's made a bad choice.
I am completely at a loss. We have tried everything with him. I've heard the "don't worry he won't go to kindergarten without being potty trained" Well I beg to differ!
A flock of various warblers invaded the ship for awhile. They seemed to be exhausted, so I don’t know if they had been blown off course by all the winds lately or if they have just started their migration south already. We saw 4 whales this afternoon and I took a movie of one when he surfaced a few times.
Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: A punishment for who?
...You love to roll around now...
Mister please go easy, oh
A possible misunderstanding about President Barack Obama’s health care overhaul could cloud Supreme Court deliberations on its fate, leaving the impression that the law’s insurance requirement is more onerous than it actually is.
May God, who rules over all, be praised forever and ever! Amen!
1/2 ts. of baking soda
HG World is a full-cast audio drama depicting a zombie uprising and those who try to survive it. The brainchild of Jay Smith (dr_p_venkman), the serial features the talents of numerous voice actors (including kradical as — of all things — a right-wing Vietnam vet turned radio jock named Todd Rage). Todd is the voice who guides survivors to safe havens, many of which are home improvement stores in the mountains of rural Pennsylvania. The series is a lot of fun, and it’s obvious from listening to the different episodes that everyone involved is having a good time putting this puppy together.
sleeping bathed in early light from the sun’s rise
He is just now learning to run. It is the cutest thing ever and we smile every time we see him do it. It's almost like a fast walk with his arms frantically waving up and down.
Be endearing and call everyone Beta. It may hurt your ego a but remember 75% of the people around you are under 25, and it just helps ease the situation.
But it is very tiring to hear people classify the queen or queenly conduct in the way that they do. Through beauty. Through wealth. Through snobbishness. Through demands. Through holding the reigns of servitude.
We are now off to our 3rd challenge! This challenge will be a fairly easy one.
As for direct entry to Superintendent rank and yet another ‘fast track’ scheme to Inspector; where do they think all the half-baked nonsense in policing, the bread-and-butter of this Blog, came from in the first place? It has been the widespread adoption of business management so-called skills and practices which has turned us into a semi-literate bunch of pseudo-social workers in the first place!
Hept - 6136 - Donovan Kilmartin, Texas - '04
He's prepared for just about any response including total shunning. He said the only thing she definitely won't respond with is to say "you're right, and I'll be going for a year of dialectical behavioral therapy!" (Loved that comment, victoria.)
Śrī Caitanya Mahāprabhu therefore stated that the spiritual master who plays the part of Kṛṣṇa’s representative has to consume all the sinful reactions of his disciple. Sometimes a spiritual master takes the risk of being overwhelmed by the sinful reactions of the disciples and undergoes a sort of tribulation due to their acceptance. Śrī Caitanya Mahāprabhu therefore advised that one not accept many disciples.
"Wes!" I shout, "I'm sure Doctor Ted doesn't need to know every facet of our love life."
Others will be allowed to succeed in making great sums of money, or having a legacy left to them, or in having luxuries, but God may supply you only on a day-to-day basis, because He wants you to have something far better than gold, a helpless dependence on Him and His unseen treasury.
Today, for the Creating Memories In Time Blog Hop, I created this fun card. I used Penny Black's "Snowy" stamp. Colored it with Copics. Cut out Spellbinder's 2010 Snowflakes and layered all of them with mounting foam. I hope you enjoy this creation and read on to find out how to win.
20 Love Like Blood
"Hi. Is this were I can get a shuttle ticket to the St. Louis hotel?"
The article on PM2.5 explained that despite serious health concerns relating to the emission of PM2.5 into the atmosphere, which costs the health service on average £20bn (double that spent on obesity), the regulation and monitoring of PM2.5 is almost non-existent. In contrast the US, has following the passing of the 1997 Clean Act, initiated a number of measures to regulate the emission of these particulates to the atmosphere. This was achieved despite the power companies launching a legal challenge. Fortunately, the US Supreme Court listened to the medical community and upheld the regulations.
Stupid dog Wayne thought, as he flipped his graying pony-tail over the collar on his coat. While he waited in the cold, he stared at the old wringer washing machine that stood on Abby’s front porch. He wondered why anyone would consider an antique washing machine –even one with a wooden tub–a proper front porch ornament.
Personally I think that it would behoove college football coaches to rethink the concept that only football practice can prepare an athlete for football. Nike, a huge sponsor of collegiate sports, pioneered the idea of "Cross Training" - and athletes competing in both football and track are doing some of the best cross training available.
Now we know why the public was never in any danger.
Bookshop listing with UK Bookland
"No way!" Brie shrieks. "I never knew they were related."
Row 10: Ch 2, turn. *Fpdc in next dc, Bpdc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Do not join. Finish off. Weave in ends. Use space between 2nd and 3rd dcs in flap as button hole, sew button underneath.
That's right, this fortnight we want to see your furry or feathered critter creations. Our challenge is sponsored by Robyn's Fetish, and Robyn is offering our challenge winner five free digis.
This sweepstakes runs from 4/16/12 - 5/13/12.
- Mark’s New Toy.
We left the maternal fetal medicine center, feeling slightly dazed but mostly reassured, and headed up to my OB's office, who, nice guy that he is, made me feel much better. He was glad we got the BPP and said that it's good to have this data, even though it's early to do the NST monitoring. He was very pleased with the results overall.
Can you imagine what a joy it is to listen to a person describe their childhood as normal and happy? What a relief! No half broke horses, drinks under the tree of forgetfulness, or running with scissors. Ebert was just a bookworm with two loving parents from a middle class home in a middle class neighborhood, Urbana, Illinois - I should add the caveat that this is what we USED to call middle class and not what currently passes for it. A former Catholic who questioned the dogma early on - I'm talking before the age of 10 - as I did, he still maintains a lovely spiritual aura that comes across loud and clear in his book.
I am taking advantage of my company’s very generous health insurance scheme and am getting my bunions operated on at the end of this month.
Perhaps what I love most about eating local foods is the lack of packaging and the ensuing reduction of garbage output. The animals and the compost consume all of our food-based garbage and we end up putting out one small blue box of cans and plastic for recycling and a small black garbage bag every two weeks, which we pay a $1 fee for. My goal is to one day be able not to put out that recycling box at all.
Saying goodbye is so painful.
My latest painting (actually finished the first week of Jan actually, along with another) - A brightly colored Hibiscus Fairy with a cute calico cat. I'd like to think fairies have their own miniature kitties, because I'd sure have one if I was a fairy.
Then we headed to 303W where we were greeted with a table full of appetizer selections. It was an old-fashioned pool hall (pool tables were in the back) and definitely had the feel of a laid back, sit down and have a beer-type bar. The appetizer selections were tasty, especially the soft pretzel breadsticks - yummo!
My life is back now. It’s not perfect, but it is probably the best it has been in years. Some days, I even feel like I have it all. So this year, when baseball season was coming back, I made the conscious decision to throw my weight back into my Mariner’s. Everyone predicted that they would be horrible this year…again. But I didn’t care. I downloaded some necessary apps to my phone, started following some key M’s blogs, and I started watching the games whenever I had a free night.
for your business
If our religious busyness has become so far detached from the Great Commission that it’s become more about us than about reaching others, we’re missing the point.
Watching Hammer: A blog devoted to reviewing the source of many of my favorite films. And it does with a fun style.
PokerStars Game #38840365116: Hold'em No Limit ($0.10/$0.25 USD) - 2010/01/27 23:44:16 ET Table 'Periphas' 9-max
Because of the Provera, this next cycle will be short, and maybe since last cycle felt so forced, and this cycle was just a freak show, maybe all the bad eggs are gone, and I’m due for some good luck. In the meantime, I’m going back to acupuncture twice a week, rather than sporadically, I’m going to find a yoga class, I’m locking my diet back down, I’m going to shake this cycle off, and just move on to the next and try to be positive.
I hope this helps! If you have any questions - or you need something to be a little clearer - leave a comment or send an email. Like I said, I'm still learning all of this stuff. And at first, it is really confusing. But the more you play around with things, the easier it gets! Really! So give it a try!
Wednesday March 31
BPHDC- Back post half double crochet
May 3 - Jackie Cooper, actor (Jackie in "Our Gang"), 88
In commentary for the New York Times, John McWhorter writes that our movement towards informal writing in the form of texts and e-mails is “a sign of a new sophistication in our society.” How’s that? McWhorter compares the rise of texting to the rise of language itself. He writes: “The earliest writing was based on the way people talk, and that meant short sentences with a direct logical throughline.” By extension, texting is merely a continuation of this millennia-old communication. It too is based on the way people talk and because of the speed of modern text communication, it permits a text-based conversation.
Other Science Ideas:
starting in 1801 as summer house for Charles Carroll, Jr., and his bride,
And their estimate doesn’t even include the care the octuplets have been receiving from minute one. Who paid for her prenatal care? It will probably be close to $2M total bills before they leave the hospital and someone is going to have to eat that – either the hospital or Medi-Cal. If it’s the hospital – her selfishness will directly limit the amount of charity care the hospital can offer to pregnant mothers, sick children, seniors or whomever in the immediate future.
"I'll kill you if you hurt Aley."
So intelligent 130
The original aircraft is being improved, starting with a new glass cockpit and a new satellite based navigation system. The company has not yet announced if production will occur in Texas as well as in Italy.
resources, particularly in connection with the development, utilization
Thanks for taking the time to visit our challenge.
It looks like I will be heading down to visit Maltus Everling at least two more times.
Has 12 different weight alternatives (in sand but goes higher in a similar product called a steel bell)
* – conflict with a file which does not belong to any package.
catching lightening bugs
It’s easy to expect that Herge’s beloved characters have been rendered grotesque by the mere process of transposing them from the 2D into the 3D hyperreality of motion capture in Stephen Spielberg’s The Adventures of Tintin but the fact is that Spielberg and his animation team have not unfairly wrenched these characters from their intended world, they have breathed a life and movement into them that was, in a way, always present in Herge’s book. I hesitate to suggest that Spielberg has liberated these characters from a static existence, far from it, but he has managed to construct a film that moves with the vibrancy we always feel when reading Herge’s comics. Cars and motorcycles zip through bustling crowds and market squares, planes dip and twirl and threaten to crash, guns fire and the bad guy keeps nearly winning. It’s thrilling to watch this film, stuffed as it is with all the wonder and excitement of the books and the television show which was, admittedly, my first introduction to these characters as a child.
The huge saving grace though, about my wonderful little delinquent is his emerging language. He really has me cracking up in a regular basis. Yesterday he asked me what was wrong with my poor old head. Today I heard him encouraging his sister ….”dood dirl, you can do it, open up…” at which point I spun around, just in time to save the squiggle from a dessert spoon of self raising flour.
Accounts of Lilith vary considerably, but in the most notable versions of the story, she was the original woman. God created both Adam and Lilith from the Earth, but there was soon trouble between them. Lilith refused to take a subservient position to Adam, since she came from the same place he did. Lilith however came to Adam as he lay asleep and coupled with him in his dreams. By this means, she became mother of all the uncanny beings who share this planet invisibly with mortals, and are known as the fairy races or the djinn.
Peter DiStefano - guitars, bass
Ministry of Interior ‘complicit’ in the killings
Reading an ad in a 2005 issue of Better Homes and Gardens (an ad of all places) I found my new mantra, “It’s never about the stuff.”
It turned out really cute. If I do say so myself. The garland is bead necklaces hot glued on. I think it really adds some Christmas cheer in the playroom, along with the lights we have strung around the room.
They were also anything but multicultural, certainly not in any way which would be permissible now in any staged media event. As the cameras scanned the crowd anxiously attempting to light on an ethnic face amongst the mass homogeneous whiteness, they could have been the scene of any British city of forty years ago, or indeed the myriad British towns which they do still represent.
The need to change the shape of the forehead or brow bone is very uncommon. Reshaping the forehead or the brow bone (the bone below the eyebrows) is possible but there are different procedures that can be done based on the shape of the forehead and the brow bone.
All entries must be submitted by 23:59 GMT on 16 December, 2010.
My irritation with Andie McDowell remains as strong as ever, yet I find Billy Bush strangely endearing.
Seven is a powerful horror film that has one of the best endings you will ever see. It also has some great acting and is a horror film that you will not soon forget.
There you have it, folks. A simple, two pronged attack that will end the "War on Drugs". Not only will we eradicate the menace of addiction AND liberal commie ideology, but we will restore our Christian identity to boot. Obviously, this will lead to lower violence, crime, abortion, and tax rates.
There are many things I won’t miss in this life, and one of them is the propensity toward weakness and sin. Just how readily we can be tempted, and how real those temptations can be, as well as subtle. I think of issues such as fear, anger, etc.
And principally they shall exhort their people to the reading, & hearing of the holy scriptures, & that they come together in times appointed, every man to his own Church, and that they give ear diligently to the preachers of the Gospel, and that both they do hear reverently the godly prayers which shall be spoken by the minister, and also pray themselves with him, that they may be partakers of that heavenly mysteries, as they be now godly ordained lawfully in our Churches by the authority, and commandment of the whole Realm.
2) Pay attention to your body. If your feet don’t like the new shoes, don’t keep em. If you are developing a specific body pain – watch it. See if it is growing. Stop running if you are experiencing pain. Don’t do too much too soon. Be patient. Remember Rav Sha’ul and run the race patiently! Listen to your body!
There is definitely more at work here than simple aesthetics, though I've yet to find out what it is exactly that my higher mind is focused on, what it is interested in learning- or suddenly being offered.
I was a nurse extern in the ED for a little over a year. I learned a lot about ED policies, nursing protocols, and generally how the flow of things goes. I was very confident that I would be able to smoothly transition from that role into the role of the primary nurse and on most accounts, I am. There were a couple of times this week that I felt very alone, though. My preceptor is on vacation and on Tuesday, Wednesday, and Friday, other nurses were filling in...some really AWESOME nurses, too. They were very willing to help and answer any questions I had, but the ED was CRAZY busy this week and my preceptors were being pulled in all different directions, leaving me to fend for myself at times (although not intentionally!) I know it's not supposed to be that way, but sometimes...I guess that happens. It was a scary, scary feeling.
My Horse Likes You by Bonapart
Item after item went on in this fashion, until we got to the brain teaser of them ALL....THE BODY.
At 9:17 am, the doctor cleared little Mikey’s throat and put my beautiful new son on my chest. I’d never even changed into a gown and had to frantically pull my t-shirt and bra off to avoid the blood, and there he was! When Evelyn was born she didn’t breathe right away and they took her across the room and Steve left to be with her and I had to get rid of the placenta and wait for the doctor to stitch up my episiotomy and everything before they brought her to me. I remember feeling guilty that my strongest feelings were of relief that I was done rather than the excitement of her arrival (of course I was SUPER excited, just incredibly exhausted).
This was adapted from my usual margarita recipe, which are pineapple-cilantro margaritas, inspired by the flavor profile of pineapple salsa:
Personals Hell:No Wonder You're single. Just a fun blog that serves to poke fun at the most desperate, illiterate and hopeless of people looking for a date.
None of it affects me, though, in the sense that I could probably live my life and never be adversely affected by any of the above. But I feel a compulsion to speak out about it and worry about it because it affects women in general, and I've always felt a kinship to women. I was born a feminist at my core. All I want is to be treated fairly and equally and not have lady parts become fodder for overzealous conservative politicians. We just want to be left alone in peace.
This required a little clarification.
All Timely comic book images are from my own collection except for the MARGIE COMICS #49 Al Bellman "television" panel, which was given to me by Tom Lammers several years ago. Random non-comicbook images were sourced from several online sources as was the image of ACTION COMICS #1 (no, I don't own that!).
Happy cooking!~ それじゃ～～
Love for freedom, rebelling against laid down norms, doubting a parent’s love for child (due to his/her constant tirade of anger to reform), sexual abuse, the forbidden charm of the opposite sex – this and much more the author portrays splendidly in the novel.
I think one of the worst features of our 21st century world is the general lack of caring for our neighbors, our folk, and even our own families. People are ''without natural affections'' in many cases today. And nobody feels any shame about it; they are much more out in the open with their callous attitudes today, where once people would have been ashamed to express such hard-hearted attitudes towards their own folk.
First it was crated up and brought to Paris where it was to be offered to Baron James Rothschild. However he sold it on and The National Gallery acquired it in 1855 for the princely sum of £1,977 (now £135,000 using RPI to £1,180,000.00 using average earnings) plus £2 2s. 2d. for carriage from Paris
TXUAN Blog (txuanblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
353 **7. “Shakespeare’s Alexander the Great: On Figures in All Things.” Greek Star, Chicago, Ilijnois, April 4, 2002, p. 8, April 11, 2002, p. 8. (Source: Item D-1/19/1997, below.
We are going into the third decade of chemtrail awareness and in all those years I have never had a satisfactory response from any professional corner, (such as pilots, who should or would know, unless they have no idea what they are doing and it was intentionally left out of the training video games) other than patronizing assurance the phenomena is just contrails. Ah, right, okay. One fine afternoon while under seige, we went out to the highest peak in greater socal for sincere study and met some authentic pilots also watching who blew us off as lefty hippies for our concerns as the sky grew white with ball-fringed stripes and rainbow oilys shining through the scribble scrabble of duelling joysticks imitating NASCAR favorites vying for top gun. You can see when its quittin' time by the quit-trail, zigging, zagging, looping and jerking in Mad Mouse roller coaster twists on their way back to the base for a Bud.
Somewhere inside of me there is this creative button, that I just can never seem to turn off. I drive down the road, and see something and just immediately begin thinking how I could crop, edit, change, accessories, or change it all together. Then my brain just goes into full throttle speed...
J came home early and we went to the department to pick up our child together. J took the next day off of work (which happened to be election day which meant no school) and we tried to bond as a family of three.
Had the best ride on Cruiser of the year! We went out on trail for more than an hour with lots of trotting. He was calm enough that we did some cantering. He only goes about 15 strides and then drops back to a trot (arthritis), but he is more than happy to do it! For the first time this year, we were also able to trot towards home—which was great since the mosquitoes were brutal. He would still get a little fast, and then I would make him walk for a bit until the mosquitoes caught up, again. He had lots of energy left when we got home, and I think he’d of done another hour. I guess that warm weather, 4 consecutive days of trail riding and being a few weeks away from turning 24 meant that he finally settled down to acting like a normal horse.
Okay, no seriously. I was inspired.
I’m not sure because I’ve never been traditionally published and don’t know how much in comparison I would have made otherwise. But I very much doubt I will make much money from my current novel; I have made a few hundred pounds so far but I’ll never make back the amount I spent on editing and cover design, which totaled approximately £750.
Decided to get Morris to help me build a BBQ/Fire Pit for the back. We’re going to be making the area south of the Willow Tree’s a “camping” area. Will use a 4-5′ diameter head for a pressure vessel. Adjustable grate height as well as legs on the “bowl”. Will have to use the tractor to move it, but looking forward to getting that done. Will level the area with the box blade, and maybe even build it up a little higher with some of the dirt that’s already back there. Will probably “fill” where the Willows are so no water can stand there and create mosquitoes. Will probably be thinking about what else we can do for that area to make it a real camp ground. I have to say, the camper is great, but there’s something about camping in a tent that just can’t be beat. Ez, wanted to camp tonight, she doesn’t have to work tomorrow, but I have to leave at 6:00 and I’m not ready with that short notice. So we agreed to got out next Thursday evening.
For the uninitiated, mizzle is a word peculiar to the south west of England, and it describes perfectly the weather we had nearly all weekend.
Are you ready to start something that matters?
Downtown Cleveland is located on the shore of Lake Erie with the Cuyahoga River snaking a dividing line down the middle of the region. You are either from the East Side or the West Side of Cleveland. (There are neighborhoods south of Cleveland, but those suburbs have no personality and generally are discounted). The expression “East is east and west is west and never the twain shall meet” describes Cleveland to a tee. West siders do NOT cross the Cuyahoga go to the East side and East siders do NOT cross the Cuyahoga to go to the west side. On the rare occasions when they do, it is accompanied by loud complaints about how confusing the other side is to drive in.
Thank you, Aunt Kristi, if you had never told me about Tracfone, I wouldn’t have a phone still, and I probably wouldn’t get one for several more years!
I guess I am repeating the pattern in my life: my dad couldn’t provide well for me. And my husband doesn’t provide well for me.
If the first winner doesn't get in touch with me, then the second winner moves up a place and a new comment will be chosen for the Field Notes Steno Pad. If the second winner isn't available, then a new comment will be chose for the Field Notes Steno Pad. All decisions are final, but please do enjoy the giveaway.
Yeah, right …
Now, this is where reality intrudes. Most small and medium businesses do not have the multi-million dollar marketing budgets that Coke or Ford has, so often television cannot be part of the equation. Heck, production costs alone preclude many from participating. Radio, while cost-effective – takes a true time commitment to be effective.
about Pete Ham
Thank goodness its Friday… time
1. The notes section – Although the notes section was an interesting read, it sounded preachy at many occasions.
The beautiful thing about climbing in Colorado is that, as a rock clamberer, you get the awesome benefit of “surprise days”. As a clamberer who has tabs open to Weather Underground in multiple ZIP codes, depending on where I might be climbing, and refreshes them, especially on Thursdays and Fridays, every fifteen minutes, I know well what every other Coloradoan in the state knows: it can be blizzarding one day and 65 degrees a few days later.
I have a friend, TripleF (Fine Female Friend), who I’ve always wanted to hook up with, but sadly, things have always stayed platonic between us. If you think its possible for guys and girls to be just friends, you’re wrong–given the chance, either the guy, or the girl (but usually the guy), would definitely hook up with the “platonic friend.” There will ALWAYS be sexual tension in a male/female friendship.
Barbara Rosenblat and Stina Neilson (Narrator)
This should really be read with a hearty voice and a Scottish accent, preferably with a glass of single malt in hand.
On Social Media
All Ananias and Sapphira did was lie to the Holy Spirit and hold back some money for themselves. They were taken out of this world for not being totally truthful and it says that “great fear” came out of it. This seems clear to me that God, though He loves his people, sometimes does things for His Glory and to accomplish His will, even if we don’t like it.
The Various Courts of Women have been initiated by AWHRC and El taller with several partner organizations in the different regions. Vimochana has been the local organization in Bangalore, India partnering on several of these Courts including the most recent one held here i.e Daughters of Fire, the India Court of Women on Dowry held in 2009 that many of you were part of.
Although I continue to voraciously consume virtually every release Nels Cline has any hand in, I definitely tend to prioritize projects in which he's a bandleader or composer, or a sideman to a songwriter I enjoy, over his more collaborative instrumental improv records. But this live debut by the trio bb&c, with saxophonist Tim Berne and drummer Jim Black, is one of Cline's most molten lava hot sets ever, just an ecstatic, unrelenting thrill ride of skronky melodies and propulsive rhythms.
1 implies
The one of Greta blowing the dandelion “dust” brought me to tears!! That was such a spontaneous, candid moment that I had kind of forgotten about until we got the pictures back.
She would have wanted the show to go on, so in her spirit, we will keep the majority of the events and amenities she planned in this program. We will of course celebrate her life and legacy with a tribute that we will want all of you to participate in. Please don’t bring with you on this trip any tears or sadness, only smiles and happiness, just as Jeanne would want us to carry on
After I put him down I usually water my flowers, go for a run and finish the day with a glass of wine and some TV with Mark. I heart this time.
So now the big black rain cloud has dissipated, the only black cloud is the one over my head. As you may know, even the thought of spending money can bring me out in hives ... so the idea of getting the roof re-tiled? Ooh la la!
Method 2 – Be a rep. You can earn money by promoting these surveys. To do that you need to join Project Pay Day as a rep which costs $34.95 for a lifetime membership. They say there is a way to join for free, which isn’t exactly true. You simply fill out a survey for one of the companies and at the end buy the product they are promoting like Netflix for example. So, you technically didn’t pay Project Pay Day for the membership, Netflix did, but there is still a cost involved. Once your a member you can promote the surveys to earn money. They offer you different way’s of doing this through forums and the IFW’s. So, you will be required to pay people to take surveys in hopes you will get enough people to do it to receive a payment from Project Pay Day, which is usually not to difficult if you do the work.
Because I'm switching energy companies, I was waiting for the final closure bill from my old energy provider with some dread. I thought I might be owing them all sorts of money because it had just been wintertime and an expensive time of the year. That bill came in the mail today and much to my relief, I'm getting a nice amount of money back that I can really use. The gods smiled kindly upon me.
Further, has there ever been a case where privatization has helped the stakeholders of that good or service? I don't mean shareholders (the guys who make the money, and Costco just jacked up its membership - you gotta pay for all this democracy somehow), but rather the stakeholders, a group that includes employees, customers, and communities. I've drawn a blank, so despite my budding alcoholism, I have to vote NO on this one (and wait to see when next year Costco brings us and BESTEST OF BEST Deal possible).
1½ tsp cream of tartar
Now, I’m home and still way too wired. I feel stupid when I don’t see these things coming, but in my defense, I ate 3½ tsp of marijuana butter last week when things got so bad, so I had no idea that a mere half tsp would hit me this hard. And maybe it didn’t. Maybe I’m just fucking insane. I couldn’t even screw up the courage to open my mouth at the last meeting of this group (on Wednesday), and there I was today unable to close it. At least I didn’t rattle on about myself—I don’t think I did anyway—because I was much more interested in what other people had to say. I drew them out as best I could, and when one woman mentioned that something I had written made her think I didn’t want her in the group anymore, I instantly burst into tears for having pained her so.
Great Britain, in particular, improved its navy with the quality of its ships and the training of its crews. As part of its efforts, the British maintained a regular structure for collating and disseminating intelligence gathered from all of its ships. This process provided British ships with better information, resulting in lower losses to pirates and foreign navies.
Spring has shown its face enough so that the husband has had to mow two or three times now. He’s planted his tomatoes and I have weeded around my plants at the side of the house. Ah, speaking of my plants, the husband told me about a week ago? Two weeks? Three weeks? “You won’t have to pull weeds from around your plants any more because I bought some spray.
Hibbert, C. (1962) Benito Mussolini Geneva: Heron Books.
Besides the leggings and jewelry, everything I'm wearing came from Saver's.
Chattering like a pit of lost souls battling to outcompete.
Paulaner Salvator Thomasbraeu AG Paulaner Premium Pils
When I looked at my phone this morning, I couldn’t believe it was already May. Then I walked outside into the disgusting humidity and my clothes clung to my body. Yep, it’s May and summer is coming fast.
Then I became an adult myself and took up sports like marathoning, bike touring, and yes- still long distance trail riding. These long miles out in Mother Nature agree with me on every level and, while I hate to admit it, I have become a version of Mr. Rojek. Finally, I understand the man who puzzled me for ages. Now, I too annoy others with a hearty wave and toothy grin. As others grunt and gasp up hills, I waste extra energy reflecting on the sweet smell of eucalyptus in the woods at this time of year. I incite annoyed looks from others on the trail.
Before we set out on more adventures into the mountains of Honduras, we set about doing a somewhat tedious, but necessary task: Separating the medicines brought in the Ready Relief Boxes into individual doses.
Passed away on September 3, 2005.
I magine life without His love
A couple from old jobs,
Today was my 29th birthday (I say "was" because it's 11:30 pm and my birthday privileges are almost over). I talked to my sister on the phone yesterday and she asked me how I felt about being one year away from thirty. I thought about it and answered as candidly as possible; it doesn't scare me ... as a matter of fact, I think I'm excited. My early twenties were such a hodge podge of bad decisions, immaturity and darkness and my later twenties were a time of complete redemption both spiritually and personally. I feel like with the tumult of the last decade, the next one is sure to be one of spiritual, personal, professional and relational bloom. At least that's what I'm asking God for.
First of all, remember to love your family. They are the ones who will always be there for you. Of course, every parent would love to provide their children with everything under the sun. Yet that is not always possible. The old saying goes, “money can’t buy love.” Is buying your child the latest best toy or video game out there really going to make them spend more time with you? Why not invest in actually spending time with your kids? As Peter Buffett writes in his book, Life is What You Make It: Find Your Own Path to Fulfillment, that the Buffet family (yes, this is Warren’s family) raised their kids in Omaha’s suburbia. Their family was full of love to each other that helped to build a sense of trust in the world. Peter writes that “trust” is important. Get out and meet your neighbors. You never know, the person next door to you may be holding the rope to help you out of the quicksand.
a : the portion of the vertebrate central nervous system enclosed in the skull and continuous with the spinal cord through the foramen magnum that is composed of neurons and supporting and nutritive structures (as glia) and that integrates sensory information from inside and outside the body in controlling autonomic function (as heartbeat and respiration), in coordinating and directing correlated motor responses, and in the process of learning — compare
“Better than scooting his butt all over your sleeping face ...”
Dr Ameisen displayed great courage when he decided to ‘out’ himself as a medical expert who is alcoholic. And in self-prescribing and self-medicating himself with Baclofen when no-one had used it for alcohol dependency before.
The Pulse of Mixed Media presents the results of a survey in which artists were asked questions that they had to answer in words or provided with prompts that they had to respond to with art. Here we combine both. Below you will find 3 questions from the book, one of each from the three different sections in the book.
Third Course: La Rulles Cuvee Meilleurs Voeux
written all over him.
In your head new cells are exploding
A There is no legal right to be paid for volunteering. Volunteering is something employees often do because of their own interest, but increasingly employers are recognising the business benefits of volunteering – in terms of developing skills and supporting the local community. If your employee is taking special leave then it would be up to you to decide whether that will be paid or unpaid.
Cucina Povera contains delicious recipes - from soups to pastas, meats and vegetables to desserts like this cookie called "sfratti," plural of the word "sfratto," which means eviction. These cookies are one of the old recipes from Pitigliano, a Tuscan town that once housed a large Jewish population. Sadly, many of the Jews were forced to flee during World War II, following Mussolini's racial laws. This recipe is a traditional Rosh Hashanah treat from Pitigliano's Jewish heritage.
How could they have been so wrong?
“The mine!” said Lanna in a state of grave anxiety.
That's all for the politics, folks. We now return you to regularly-scheduled Florida wildlife-watching.
At any rate, I have managed to complete the blocks I have committed to, even though this is the third month of the block swap, and I have only received one block in return.....I do remain hopeful! This block is going out to California. My July partner requested blues and browns, in scrappy form. What she didn't know is that SCRAPPY and CINDY have a real love/hate relationship! Love to look at them, can't for the life of me figure out how to do it. I can not seem to just throw together different patterns, I need a plan. I do, however think that this looks pretty nice, and the fabrics look well together. I hope it fits into what she wanted!
innate, cloistered closure
we always tell you to be the bigger person. to be nice even if others aren't. but, we got caught up in our own crap this time. we showed you anger and judgement. all those things i want to shield you from have been present in our home. and you've seen, heard, and taken it all in, which breaks my heart.
I am happy to report that I did succeed in keeping last year's resolution. Most of my home is now clutter free. I am not afraid of people peeping into my closets or of asking someone to get something from the pantry for me. The local Thrift Store has been thrilled with my donations while the trash collectors have cussed at the weight of my garbage can, and my home is happier for it. I still have a few spots that need some polishing, and I don't lie to myself that this job will ever be complete. Keeping a clean and tidy home inside and out is work, but I am not afraid. I am resolved to conquer clutter.
During the C1 class and in the days soon after, most of the entities I contacted insisted that I didn’t need them and that they wouldn’t be speaking through me on other occasions. I remember being especially disappointed at hearing that from Kuan Yin, and sincerely protesting that I did too need her, unable to understand why I was being abandoned. I think I understand now. Channeling is not my primary function, and is not going to be. I can receive information on my own more easily than I can through another being. That doesn’t mean I can’t have friends in high places, though, and I still intend to pursue better communication with them.
The closest I've ever come to cross-country jumping is hopping over low logs in a field, and I'm only just now beginning to grasp the correct fundamentals of flatwork, but I was reading a past issue of Practical Horseman and good old Jim Wofford mentioned that he had a rider rating chart on the PH website.
When he got out a cocktail making book i said 'ooooh thats creative, well done' and he looked me straight in the face and said 'Hey, im not creative, im an alcoholic' like being creative was the mark of the devil. Poor creatively blocked lamb. Sounds like someone needs to do morning pages ;D
Childs's mythology isn't particularly original in the current plague of Greek mythology-inspired YA, but it's certainly not bad. I've read Medusa re-imagined more times than I can count this year--she seems to have become a feminist icon, unfairly smeared by history, which surprises and delights me--and Sweet Venom actually holds its own against the competition. I particularly liked the girls' struggle to disguise their fangs, which struck me as a funny metaphor for growing up and discovering so many brand-new girl parts. I don't know. Maybe I'm reading into things.
125ml chicken stock
the ruthless, mercenary, onward march of life...
4. Make sure the fellow traveller who is annoying you can see the screen.
Over the long haul, has any other organized sport successfully maintained postseasons in competition with each other? The story over and over with such situations is that the competitors merge or the stronger eventually shuts down the weaker.
The competition will run until Monday 8.30pm Perth time. Good luck all!!
Membranes in between the lobes of a succenturiate placenta can be torn during delivery resulting to massive blood loss. The small lobes can be retained in the uterus after delivery that could lead to severe maternal hemorrhage. This can be detected on inspection of the placenta at birth, where it appears torn at the edge. The remaining lobes must be removed from the uterus manually to prevent bleeding.
In conclusion, weight loss does not need to be a difficult venture, just approach it from a different angle.
It was given to me by a friend who left the country. It came in an old
Every time I went to the hospital, they sent me to Labor & Delivery, and every time, they hooked me up to the monitors, and each time, they did detect contractions, sometimes as close as six minutes apart. They were very concerned. They would check my cervix to see if I was dilating, thankfully and miraculously I never was, which was an amazing blessing. I also never spotted and never leaked fluid at all. They checked my blood pressure and very often did a test which is called a fetal fibronectin
I regretted my gloves (folded
In our example it is C - Eb - G, that's the C minor chord.
Instead I told him that I had to get back for a dentist appointment and clenched my fists to keep from scratching a fresh itch that had surfaced on my forehead. “Another time, though,” I said.
Elementary school: Level I through Level V (I’m using Roman numerals for the various levels),
In historical context, property owners were levied taxes by their respective governments to pay for the community services they requested from the governments they formed. That made sense to everyone, especially as property ownership was a requirement to vote. Interesting concept, the people who paid the taxes were the ones who decided how the taxes would be spent. Wow, how times have changed! (But that’s another argument altogether!) Now at least in Lee County, tax dollars collected out in the county do not directly benefit the very people who have paid them. City police and fire services do not extend into the county neither do city maintenance and road crews. In other words, the people paying the collected taxes no longer have a say in how the money is spent.
marrying and giving in marriage,
Instead of asking me to defend my decision to partner with my children as equals, how about I ask you to defend your decision to limit the choices your children have and behave in an authoritative manner? What exactly are you trying to accomplish by setting rigid rules of behavior for your children? Do you really believe that you know more about how things should be than your children do? Why exactly should your children have to respect you on your terms, while you don't feel the need to respect them on their terms? Do you enjoy being yelled at, restricted, and told what to do? Do you think your children will be able to fully blossom into the people that they want to be if you restrict and punish them when they do things you don't like?
It's time for a giveaway! Are you excited???
that experience. Safe and sound to the other side was what counted. It
1/2 cup well-shaken buttermilk
without being asked. And the poor lady, so small in her black satin, shrivelled up and sallow, with her funny corkscrew curls, took the little boy on her lap and put her arms around him and wept as though her heart would break. But her tears were partly tears of happiness, for she felt that the strangeness between them was gone. She loved him now with a new love because he had made her suffer.”
A very classically Illustrated and written childrens book that delivers a modern message. The men and women that serve in the armed forces of America are the same men and women that allow life as we know it to continue. So many people take that service for granted, and it is a shame. Books like this one, remind us to be thankful and hold the service men and women in our hearts and thoughts. They are our "troopers" keeping watch over us, even when we sleep.
Show Bob that by doing a 1035 exchange with his current policy into a guaranteed 30-year term/UL product and continuing to pay the $1,500 annual premium, he can restore his policy to age 85 and provide a death benefit guaranteed for 30 years. If he decides later that he needs the coverage longer, he can increase the planned premium to an amount that will carry the guarantee for as many years as needed.
And this weekend I did some more work in your nursery. For pretty much all the decor either coming from a thrift store or being hand-made, I think it turned out pretty nice! I still have a couple more things to add, but we're getting there. You won't even be sleeping in this room for a few months at least, but having it done before you are born was just something I really wanted to do.
I’d like him to get into recognising colours next but he will only learn when he wants to learn – I’ve tried this in the past and if his mind isn’t interested in something he won’t TRY to learn!!
I FELL IN LOVE with Europe...
If you missed any of the info for this month's gorgeous kit, check it out on The Key Ingredients Blog and you can sign up to become a subscriber right HERE. Here is a look at the April kit, which includes a full 6" x 6" pad of Simple Stories - Fabulous, mini kraft tags, mini paper flowers, and the usual coordinating cardstock and ribbon!
Hmm. Now we’re getting to the meat of the conversation. Is the fact that our communities and connections are getting bigger, with weaker connections, but more interactions, a good thing?
Min 13: It’s fine if you unfollow me, I don’t take it personally. I know it only means that we are not the right fit.
It’s the Las Vegas Callbacks! Again, do you have any favorites? Are you looking forward to all the blood? Yeah, me too. Part Two airs on Thursday.
This week was one of many joys and sadness for us. My best man and childhood friend, Aidan became a father welcoming his daughter Ainsley to this world on March 30,2011. Glo and I are extremely happy for Aidan and his wife Angela for their blessing. Yet, this week was also a time of sadness for us. My great uncle, Ricardo, passed away on March 27th. Although, I never felt close to him, I feel saddened by his passing. He was someone who loved his family and was a great man who achieved many things in his lifetime.
Dancing Days
Stamps: Inspired by Nature, Well Scripted
projection of return on investment.
The Shadows of Kings Paperback is now available for Pre-Order at Barnes & Noble: Purchase link is: http://www.barnesandnoble.com/w/shadows-of-kings-jack-whitsel/1110607454?ean=9781606192238
Throughout the years the Muppets have also produced numerous public service announcements and have acted as spokespeople for many causes both domestically and internationally, ranging from The National Wildlife Federation, UNICEF and the American Film Institute, to the University of Maryland, the American Library Association and the Better World Society. Kermit regularly appears as a giant balloon in the Macy’s Thanksgiving Day parade in New York City.
I want to put the Bulls higher on this list (read No. 1), but I just can’t do it until I see more out of Derrick Rose. Yes, I know, the team has played great basketball with Rose out of the lineup. But there is no way this team can compete with the elite in the NBA without their superstar. They cannot possibly expect Luol Deng, Carlos Boozer, Richard Hamilton, and Joakim Noah to hold their own over a 7-game series with the Heat. If Rose plays like the MVP he was last season, it is a completely different story. If that were to happen, the Bulls become my favorite to win it all with one of the three players most capable of taking over a game and a stingy defense.
Blatner, who is also a spokeswoman for the American Dietetic Association, recommends three or more cups of lentils or beans each week.
When I see something, more often than not, I feel confident enough to say, “I could make that!’” I’m not sure what I am that person. But I am.
The tabloids call him The Birthday Boy. He’s been snatching girls for twelve years, always in the run-up to their thirteenth birthday, sending the families his homemade cards showing their daughters being slowly tortured to death.
souls on fire.
I've been doing a number of wedding party gift orders, special orders.
Psalm 32: 6-7: (God’s Word)
Business cards, letterhead and brochures
started on it-with Vent-A-Hood. You’ll know you made the right choice.
HARARDA H, KOBAYASHI T, WAKAMOTO Y, et al. The efficacy and problems with influenza vaccination among hospital workers. Nippon Koshu Eisei Zasshi 2003; 50: 547-552.
Offer Details:
Well, to our delight, instead of winning the contest and getting a mere ONE day off, we were given THREE days off. Who are the real winners, you kiss-ass "winning" bitches with your lonely, single day off, huh?
“How lonely lies the city that once thronged with people! Once great among the nations, now she is like a widow! Once princess among provinces, she has become a vassal.
Spinach is my favorite green to use when making this dish, but chard works well, too. You may notice in the photo that this time I used collard greens because that's what I had on hand. While it was still tasty, I don't really suggest using collard greens because they were a little more bitter than what works well with the spices. If you decide to use chard, be sure to cut out the stems and use only the leaves.
Furthermore, and despite our reputation as a segregated, broken city, Bradford West has shown that culture, religion and ethnicity are not the be-all and end-all, nor even, quite frankly, important. Something lots of places can learn from. Bradford West is mixed, with 40% of voters being of Pakistani heritage and, probably, Muslim… yet it has never had a Muslim MP. The previous incumbent, Masha Singh, is Sikh. If the whites are so racist and the Muslims are pro-Islamic, how come we had a non-white, non-Muslim for over a decade? Actually, we’re a bit of a model for inclusion in this area, choosing to ignore colour and creed and elect the party and the man (Singh bucked the swing to the Conservatives in the last election) it wants. Make Bradford British? What’s more British than democratic choice, picking the right person for the job and believing in one’s right to self determination over all?
I came the night before and set up everything in the church for the shoot. The next day we had an all day date planned where we bought the canvas, built the stretcher, stretched the canvas and then had some great friends serve us dinner. Little did Ciera know that she was served a worm in her soup (payback from the time she fed me a chocolate covered worm).
That being said, I’m happy to know that I’ve truly experienced Texas. I know my little town of Fort Worth and know I will always be welcomed back. I’ve done Texas and compared to many, I’ve done it well. I’m sure I’ll find other things in Florida that I love. I’m sure I’ll discover joy in Floridian Cuisine (whatever THAT is). And I’m sure I’ll have visitors. That’s the good thing about moving to Disney World. Most people go there at one time or another.
I am always snaffling pieces from people to include and generally everyone is more than happy to be included.
Get back into drawing.
it had black walls (previous owners) and she wanted to keep them,
3. Johannes P. Louw and Eugene Albert Nida, vol. 1, Greek-English Lexicon of the New Testament Based on Semantic Domains, electronic ed. Of the 2nd edition (New York: United Bible Societies, 1996), 164
The liberalisation policies introduced in the country has led to tremendous changes in the import and export business. The Indian exports have been experiencing a massive growth but so is the import sector.
After Freddie completed his education at St Mary’s School in Bombay he headed back to Zanzibar. Political unrest was to send the family away, and they immigrated to England, where they initially lived with relatives.
The greedy thieves who came around
To that end, I produced a new version of the IRS’s 1040 form which featured (exactly as the post’s title implied) “voluntary tax rates and personalized earmarks.” But that was last August. Who, after all these months, remembered to use those new forms now that Tax Day has rolled around again?
** or possibly handed over personally - see below...
During the opening sequence with the ballerina literally dancing her feet off, I wondered if the shoes were cursed or if the janitor was responsible (yes, despite the curse boxes in the "THEN" section). Nice parallelism with the mop, though.
In her written reply, Sisulu said she was not prepared to make a statement on the missing weapons.
Spain's fascists traditionally gather at the vast basilica, which took 19 years to build using forced labour by Republican prisoners, to pay homage to the late dictator on the Saturday following the date of his death.
WSC Matches- 14, Runs- 1281, Avg- 55.69, 100s- 4, High- 177
So I decided that I want to be a teacher.
Leaving Trains - Transportational D. Vices (SST 1989)
Many parents with sensory difficulties normally avoid such places but when they're chosen by other parents as venues for children's parties, they often attend rather than deny their own children a chance to make friends.
I love where I live this time of year. There are five colleges nearby, and dozens of farms. The small towns up the road are called the hill towns, one after another. This Sunday, Mother's Day, in the middle of two emotional windstorms, JB and I drove the back roads through the hill towns. It was the best thing for me.
This blog will also discuss any interesting projects I work on as an editor, if the circumstances allow, as I would like to write more about the different crafts in both film and television. The first year of this blog definitely skewed towards more traditional written reviews of newer films, but I do promise there will be more older films to be the subject of written or video pieces, whether I am watching them for the first time or revisiting a classic or less-than-classic. Once again, if Hollywood continues to release what they're putting out now, I plan to largely ignore those movies and talk about something more interesting. That's why I enjoy the freedom of blogging.
The gate was opened by Baba/while Oga was driven speedily…”
Getting information out of the working memory and making the information retained is the goal with this guideline. Those few minutes spent discussing previous experiences before diving into a new lesson are minutes well spent.
and you brought me to this place of reckoning
Its all quiet, just Christmas carols playing on the computer. Martha is already in bed along with Rhiannon and Drew. Layne and Dean are in the basement making music. I just have the stocking left to do. I am left pondering how things are the same and how things are different. It amuses me how much pleasure it gives me how important some of our traditions are to my grown children. Great fuss is made over when everyone can come to decorate cookies. And I remember my own childhood and decorating sugar cookies - remember those little ball bearings that could crack your tooth and destroy fillings? You never see those any more.... And I wonder how it will be when there is no one to decorate the tree... Will I even do it if they aren't here to do it with me? Children and family really are the point of Christmas for me. I have had, until now, a steady, unbroken chain of young children and babies in my Christmases. My daughter and my youngest sisters are the same age, after all. Now Rhiannon is 11. There is no one who even pretends to believe in Santa. In fact, this year there will be no Santa gifts under the tree in the morning. In lieu of Santa gifts we are going to Mexico as a family for Dean's 50th birthday. We leave on January 11th so we actually be there for the day of his birthday. We are all pretty excited. Andrew picked up his passport today so that is it. We are a family with passports. We can cross the boarder together. So we just got each other small gifts. I made almost all of my gifts which isn't really different. But this Christmas has a different feel. A more grown up feel. Its good different. I know it is unlikely it will be like this forever, with all my children here around me.
There are 5 different personalities that make up the Ghost….yep, 5 different voices that run around up between my ears. They all have names: The White Knight, Dark Side, Prodigy, Pathos and Everto.
Listening is just the beginning, but being a part of “Team Listen” is a great first step! But we also must put people first, be their advocates in our companies!
What does God’s discipline look like? Heb. 12:6-11 explains that God disciplines those He loves and that He understands how painful it is; but He knows that “afterward there will be a peaceful harvest of right living for those who are trained by it” (vs. 11). He allows sin’s consequences to affect us and hopes that in suffering we will choose to draw close to Him. For the woman at the hospital, it was obvious that God was using the condition of her baby to draw her back to Him. Not every physical illness or every type of sorrow or suffering we encounter is a result of our sin. No. We live in a sinful world and the consequences of it will touch us at times, also giving us opportunity to draw close to God. That said, we must recognize that Satan is like a roaring lion seeking to devour us, or at least to keep us from being effective Christians (1 Peter 5:8). The only way he can destroy us is to cause us to remove ourselves out from under God’s protection, isolate us not only from God but from His people and those who love us, making us spiritually, emotionally and mentally weak and vulnerable to his tactics. He usually accomplishes this as we begin to believe his lies and take his bait. But when we run back to God and draw close to Him, God’s consuming fire will defeat and destroy the enemy of our soul, and He will restore, establish and strengthen us (1 Peter 5:10). As we walk close to Jesus according to His ways, then we can pray that God will remove the consequences of the sin.
Matt Ryan, I apologize, but in my house, you are a much-loved and respected red Puffle.
The last day of Insanity happens to be the day of the Central Florida Triathlon in Clermont, FL. I should be ready for this after Insanity. I have to see if I can swim in the base pool, but either way it’s only 400yds, so a few times in the pool and I will be fine! This week however, I am relaxing. I am just hanging out and recovering physically. I’m going to give my body the week off to rest itself before kicking its ass for 63 days!
In the end, I know juice fasting isn’t for me, but from time to time, I will be making myself some juice or rather raw baby food! But I still find this information very interesting.
I like to read. I like to be around people who do as well. Now, these days, there are more than one way to gather info. You don't have to be a book worm to be well read. But I do believe it is safe to assume that the majority of patrons of the library are somewhat educated. Or at least they desire to be. It's nice to meet people that carry a wide variety of conversation. But still, there's more.
I followed this sketch from The Sweet Stop in creating my card, except that I rotated the sketch 90 degrees clockwise. The sentiment I wanted to use from the Cocoa Ants set and the marshmallow embellishments I created seemed to work better with the sketch rotated like this.
LOS ANGELES (Jan. 17, 2011) –There’s no escape when “BREAKOUT KINGS,” comes to DVD on March 13 from Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment. Don’t miss the chance to catch up on the gripping suspense, meet the provocative characters and experience the non-stop action that helped “BREAKOUT KINGS” Season 1, post record ratings for an original drama series on A&E.
All in all it was a wonderful backpack. Fall is my favorite season for hiking, and it was luxurious to get to spend a night alone in the wilderness with a roaring fire and cool night air. I'm also happy to have gotten a few of the "dead-end" trails finished off from this section of the park. A couple more loops and I'll have the whole Cades Cove / Abrams Creek section of the park finished (assuming they ever open up Beard Cane and Hatcher Mountain trails again...).
The Pearl Barley idea came about as it seems to be every vegan’s secret weapon. I am not a vegan, but anything that’s good for them, can’t do me any harm either. The smell when I was boiling it was not so great (1 part barley to 5 parts stock) but drain it, and add it to passata with some herbs and garlic and suddenly it becomes this tasty and filling side dish. If anyone has any other sauce recipes that would work well with pearl barley, please do share them as I’m thinking it’s my new favourite grain – easy to prepare, wholegrain and filling.
This is definitely going to become a regular pudding in our household. It's quick to make with a minimum mess and it's super tasty too! The whole family ate every single bite! To make it I adapted Mark Sargent's recipe for the quantities of ingredients that I had.
The 0.4 percent rise in March inventories followed gains of 0.6 percent in February and 0.1 percent in January.
~Your name and a link to your blog will be displayed on the Inky Impressions Challenge Blog and on the Inky Impressions Inspiration Blog.
Sistahs on the Shelf is up for a 2009 Lezzy Award in the Entertainment/Culture category from The Lesbian Lifestyle website. Sistahs needs your nominations, and you can do that by clicking the banner above. Only the top 3 nominated blogs will move on to compete for the winner of this category. You can make one nomination every 24 hours, and be sure to check your email to click on the confirmation link listed there.
"You could well be right Jim", I reply, nodding my head.
A third successive one-two for McLaren at the Circuit de Catalunya, and a third victory for Mika. Michael Schumacher runs him close this time, having started from pole, but the Ferrari driver drops back to fifth during the latter stages. David takes second once again.
When I first heard that my mother had been diagnosed with bowel cancer I was distraught.
It was estimated by many there, and from 'known' donations that around £1500 was 'in the hat', including £500 from the host, and several £100 and £50 donations from working members.
Still, I get up, as quickly as I can (which means slowly) before someone tries to help me and manage to get to the play- and actually enjoy it relatively pain free despite the fact this young guy had to squeeze in next to me- significantly restricting my leg movement.
The above photo casting doubt on the blessing of pregnancy and quoting Malthus, was judged Best Advertisement on "Population Control" in a contest organised by a leading advertising portal in New Delhi in July 2007.
Woohoo! Today I am posting my 100th post on this blog. Who knew I would have made it this far after starting VIMWAC just this summer?
P.S- The Run Down on Me Schedule- I am not gonna post tomorrow. I don’t think. I mean I guess I could but I am taking a break from constantly being on here. If I DO IT WILL BE ON MY IPOD TOUCH! I am only gonna post if something amazing or incredible happens at school. Follow my blog? Please.:)
Former NHL hotshot playboy Dane Croft has returned home to open a survival training school on an old ranch and reinvent himself. When his former high-school girlfriend enrolls in the program, he has no idea that Miranda’s plan is to get him in a compromising position—not the one he’s imagining, anyway. But soon Miranda realizes that to carry out her deviously sexy revenge, she’ll have to get up close and personal with Dane all over again. Being a good girl got her nowhere for nine years; now it’s time to be a little naughty. But falling in love with the man who broke her heart was never part of the plan…
Knowing how depraved adolescent boys just discovering the joys of their penis are, can you imagine what Superman was like when he was in his early teens? All his origin stories focus on him running around a farm, lifting tractors and such, but they overlook what happens when he discovered his powers and his wiener at the same time. Sure, he’d probably stop a 3-story tall rampaging robot, but he’d also be masturbating constantly (he’d never get chafed, he’s freaking invulnerable). No one would look at him like a hero if they knew what he got up to when he was exploring his super-sexuality. “Sure, he saved that bus full of kids, but did you see that video of him supersonically masturbating on the moon? That dude’s messed up.”
Back to the story.
And waited. And waited....
Once you get into the pattern of interviews, there is plenty of time to prepare your Pastoral Exercise in between whiles and into the evening, as the interviews were well spaced. The second evening I focused on completing the exercise (which can be done electronically and printed out on site if you have a laptop and peg-drive with you) and didn’t use the bar. There weren’t tea/coffee making facilities in the rooms, but it was easily accessible at all times of day and night.
7. Can save you time and money in the long run by preventing chronic pain and future disability.
Expenses £1570
This did not appear to be the case, even as inflatable castles and makeshift skateboard parks were set up.
By law, officers are only allowed to make an arrest if they have ' reasonable suspicion' that a person has committed a crime.
I consider myself a republican and a conservative, but I appreciate this critique, and I agree. Perhaps this is just another indication that the leaders of this country are NOT accurately representing the left and the right appropriately. I pray that more dialogue like this and more connections across the isle will change the behavior of our leaders.
Instead, he spoke, “I’m going to lie down for a bit in the master bedroom. Tattletale, Skitter, you keep an eye on things. Wake me when you need a relief.”
-G2S blocked again.
LOVE and PEACE
Mike and I are creating our own holiday traditions. I didn’t grow up celebrating Christmas or Hanukkah or Kwanza or even the solstice, so I have no history of traditions. I’m not sure what Mike’s excuse is, but he has no holiday sentimentalities either. Creating our own holiday practices is difficult and feels a little forced. I suspect it will take us many years to get it right.
Leslie will be giving away a $25 Barnes and Noble GC to one randomly drawn commenter during the tour. Enter a comment below and automatically be entered to win. Follow the tour, comment at each stop -- the more times you play the more chances you have to win!
And I had a new dress! More on that soon…
D came out of school well, she had made English biscuits (?) today for a St George’s day assembly later on in the week. They’re also going to be watching morris dancing.
Seriously, somebody needs to be fired for letting her walk on stage in that outfit. Even more seriously, what in the hell happened to her beaver?!? Clearly something traumatic happened which explains her insane decision to name one of her twins, Moroccan.
After enjoying the views and savoring my accomplishment, I set off down the mountain. Sometimes, going down the hill is more challenging than going up the hill. This hike was no exception. There were some VERY steep sections (the trail guide described the trail as nose diving), so it was all about concentrating and taking your time. The funniest thing was as I was picking my way down the hill, and feeling quite alone, (except for the turkey vultures gliding the thermals overhead – why did I feel like they were waiting for something?), my cell phone starts ringing. Needless to say, I didn’t stop to answer it, and I was actually glad to know I had cell phone reception at this point, but it did make laugh at the craziness of technology these days.
Putting all of the pieces together, I think we may have been listening to an “angel,” or, to put it into more modern terms, one of the “good Annunaki” who are totally opposed to the renegade group in control of this planet, and that “their days are numbered.”
No. No, I didn't think that. Don't get me wrong, I'm not that picky about cars, and more than anything I was thankful to be in Hawaii. But driving my grandparents' car around the island? Really?
Finally in late-January I went to my primary care physician and had her draw blood. I told her it was my thyroid. She wasn't too interested in what I had to say after that. She went with it and drew the blood. Lo and behold, my thyroid was perfectly fine. The only thing that was low was my Vitamin D. So she prescribed me a hefty dose of Vitamin D and that was that. No follow up. No calls to see how everything was going. Nada. Oh - and that I may want to try a Gluten Free diet for a bit to see if that helped.
In my case, I remember how this sense of ownership manifested itself on one occasion. I'd read in a weekend magazine that one of my literary heroines, Maya Angelou, had just collaborated with Hallmark on a series of cards bearing her inspiring poetry. I recall feeling betrayed and even if I didn't go online to pour bile on the "people's poet" and her alleged "treason", inside me there was a little voice shouting out: "Sellout! Sellout!" But sell out to whom? Maya is Maya is Maya is Maya. The poems she contributed to Hallmark's regular middle-of-the-road output might not have had, in my humble opinion, the same quality of her masterpieces "Still I Rise" or "Phenomenal Woman" but they were still better than the usual crop Hallmark produces. That was, as I mentioned before, many years ago. The other day I read an interview with her in the paper where she was telling a journalist that she had just written a cookery book. She then went on to explain how some people thought it strange that she had decided to venture down a road that was so far from her main occupation, that is, to write poems. Presumably, and this is pure speculation, these people - amongst them, critics - considered cooking a less worthy activity than poetry. However, I remember thinking after I finished reading her interview that if there was one person in the world for whom the word "cooking" was created, that person was Maya Angelou.
But then things began to happen — things that made his men stare in amazement and the enemy run for their lives!
CONCLUSION: Definitely a touching and interesting story — but slow-moving, long dramas aren’t quite our thing. Billy Bob Thorton’s performance was possibly his best ever, but that doesn’t stop us from rating this a mere 3 stars — lower than every single Netflix friend who rated it. This is still a “must see” of a movie, however, as it is referenced and spoofed in many other works.
Each time I come to Buenos Aires my favourite nights and favourite milongas change as new milongas start and people change the places they go to. But some, of course, remain constant favourites like Canning. Wednesdays and Thursdays are my least favourite evenings at the moment as there is no clear favourite place for me to head to. For example, on Thursday there is one place I like which has a lot of people but the music leaves a lot to be desired and the dance flow is non-existent and scrappy to say the least, last night it made me feel that I should have stayed home and rested for the next day of lessons.
Recurrent suicidal attempts, gestures, threats, or self-injurious behaviors are the hallmark of the borderline patient. The criterion is so prototypical of persons with BPD that the diagnosis rightly comes to mind whenever recurrent self-destructive behaviors are encountered. Self-destructive acts often start in early adolescence and are usually precipitated by threats of separation or rejection or by expectations that the BPD patient assume unwanted responsibilities. The presence of this pattern assists the diagnosis of concurrent BPD in patients whose presenting symptoms are depression or anxiety.
Eating a Big Mac
The Man Who Knows Everything – by Ryan D’Agostino – January 19, 2012, 10:30 AM
doing it better next time (next time!!)
One recent surprise is the discovery that the costs of obesity exceed those of smoking. In a paper published in March, scientists at the Mayo Clinic toted up the exact medical costs of 30,529 Mayo employees, adult dependents, and retirees over several years.
Become a homebrewer! If you like Chocolate Ale and want to always have access to it, or any other of your favorite commercial brews, then make it yourself. Homebrewing is not difficult and the rewards are amazing. If you want Chocolate Ale on tap at your place, then brew it up! For a starters list on homebrewing check out my suggestions in the homebrew section.
Tell us about Thomas-Edward – why is he so special?
4. I knit for my mental health.
Food Issue of the Year: One of the most important, and sometimes controversial, food issues I addressed this year was seafood sustainability. From the Legal Sea Foods blacklisted dinner to concerns about bycatch of sea mammals, I have covered a number of local seafood issues, delving behind the science and rhetoric. The importance of this matter cannot be underestimated, but it is sometimes difficult to get to the truth behind the issues. I am sure the issue will retain its prominence on my blog next year as well. To read all of my posts on this topic, check out the sustainability tag.
The large numbers of PGI and PDO products already registered, along with
I am really happy with the outcome. I was also thinking of putting a small basket at the bottom of the cupboard to put clothes in that are too small and make a rule that when the basket is full it must be put into the clothes tub. I will be buying another tub for his size 5 clothes as I try and buy clothes a season ahead.
Excellent spy-thriller plot
I hope that women everywhere will be inspired by Adele, and other similar role models, and not feel the pressure to loose those beautiful curves!
i am so sorry plants. i tried.
﻿Close up of the gorgeous necklace James got me not long after we had been going out. I was about to have knee surgery and was scared shitless and he bought me home this necklace with matching earrings one day - what a sweetie right?
"THE AFFAIRS OF THE GREAT WHISKY FIRM.
The wind picked up speed and started swirling around in front of her, merging the evil specks into a vortex of blackness. More afraid than ever, Alaria moving again and found she could now wiggle her toes. The dust devil grew bigger as it sucked in the blackness. The sky started to appear above her.
I looked to the West and saw the sun’s pink rays slowly beginning to bleed through the thick clouds. At once the air was filled with the familiar sound of camera shutters rattling off shots like machine guns spewing artillery rounds. The lower the sun sank, the more intense the colors became. Clouds that had been bland and gray only a few moments before now became a canvas upon which the sun painted intense hues of pink and orange.
This afternoon on our way home from the ruins we went up to the top of Temple IV to see the Star Wars view – DA-da, da da da DA da! But it didn’t look exactly like in Star Wars, but tomorrow morning it will because I’m getting up at three thirty and going there and watching the sun come up with the mist over the forest jungle and it’s going to look exactly like Star Wars except without the ship coming in.
I’m no ornithologist, but I know a swan from a Magpie. I’d love to be better at it, but that requires a good memory, which brings me back to why I’m doing this blog.
Evolution - Secret Spot Ale
So she had a baked potato that Daddy brought home at lunch time. She had a little bit of jello but didn't really like it much. Then the floodgates of hunger opened wide and I had to fight to keep her from eating us out of house and home. I had to keep reminding her that we wanted food in her tummy so she wouldn't feel hungry but also didn't want her to be stuffed full. But then she saw the Trader Joe's Spinach and Sour Cream Dip and the pita crackers and she couldn't resist. She had a cheese stick. She had soy and flaxseed tortilla chips with pineapple salsa. She had rotiserrie chicken and watermelon. She knew Mommy wasn't going to give in on any sugary junk so she stopped asking about going to get a milkshake or cookies.
I Bought like 7 Boxes of falsies
And sites like Flavorwire thrive on such lists. But if we zoom out, a self-reinforcing feedback loop emerges in both content and downloads: articles in the Most Viewed category tend to stay there, and as Bilton notes with iTunes, there’s a big gap between being tenth and eleventh.
Travellers from the great spaces
I have had to insure my "extremely dangerous" organ
“He walked?” my mother asked. “Did he do that for you?”
Now the Tun also spoke of PR being a loose coalition that would spilt up quite easily. How presumptuous.
So Sassy!
You see, it goes both ways. Women are scrutinized for being too heavy, but they’re also scrutinized for being too thin. I’m proud of all of the “embrace your curves” movements going on out there, but too often those images of beautiful, curvy women are next to images of very thin women with a caption that says something to the effect of ”I’d rather be curvy than look anorexic.” Granted, many of those pictures show a thin woman that looks obviously unhealthy, and I know it’s meant to comment on the pressure women are under to be dangerously thin, but is that actually the message that comes across? To me, it says that you love your body, but … what? “Ew, that skinny girl is gross?”
All in the heart of Texas.
5.that which causes a feeling of being afraid; that of which a person is afraid: Cancer is a common fear.
Under masses of concrete
I was quite amazed as she was a Hindu...
By an order in council of the 8th of September 1873 it was decreed that services should be held in all Icelandic churches to commemorate fhe millenary anniversary of the first settlement in Iceland, and it was left to the Bishop of Iceland to decide upon a day and the choice of a text for the service.
Here is a collection of my favorite photographs from the last year.
So, albeit in a very small way, I can relate to Lenore’s experience and I can say that it sucks!
Can’t hold on longer, don’t want to
would have been considered wasteful.
“These amazing easy to learn (and do) emotional freedom techniques help your child to cope with the little bumps in life – both physical and emotional!
As of today, the PF is still hurting when I walk but it’s now more of a dull pain. I am still ice rolling my foot and the guy at Big Peach gave me some stretches to do. We have a trail run practice on Saturday to get ready for a 15k race in June and I am really hoping I am ready to run pain free by then. I realize it is only 3 days away but I really need to run!
It's not as nice as the old one;
P.S Hope you like the photos of sparklers from NYE. I'm kind of obsessed with them. Sparklers I mean.
Fanaticism:
The fine print of the so-called agreement between President Obama and President Hamid Karzai allows for troops and de-facto military bases to remain in Afghanistan well beyond 2014—in fact, for decades to come. This agreement was signed just weeks before the NATO summit to make it clear that the United States intends to remain the master of Afghanistan under the banner of a “NATO force.”
I'm overdoing it with these spring/ summer pastel and milky colours aren't I? It's just that I made a point to at least use some of my lighter colours that have been sitting on the shelf for what seems like forever. So, I have a few swatches and manis in mind to show you.
and not fear of the future
Creation of the snow was such a blessing for children. I cannot emphasize enough how much I enjoy watching Matthew playing in the snow. This little busy bee enjoys himself to the fullest - making snowman, throwing snowballs, making giant snowballs, making snow angles, removing snow, cleaning cars with the broom, mowing snow (yes just like cutting grass) and tobogganing.
I returned from Kroger today with a 12-pack of orangeade, a 12 pack of lemonade, and a 12 pack of Coke Zero (not for me!).
Mr. SHIRLEY BENN (no relation) asked the Prime Minister whether it was the business of the British Ambassador at Washington to be aware of the fact that the object of the reciprocity agreement between the United States and Canada was to make Canada an adjunct of the United States
I had some other misgivings before going in: Silent melodramas (as opposed to comedies and swashbucklers) are often dreary to watch. As are certain modern attempts to recreate the genre (I’m thinking mainly of the films of Guy Maddin, which are beautiful but a little of him goes a long way). But Hazanavicius has his eye on the bottom line. There’s enough comedy, drama, sex, action and even dance to keep the thing moving. And in the end, a silent film, like any film, is about movement. We were engaged and moved the whole time.
A tragic accident has turned eleven-year-old Aubrey’s world upside down. Starting a new life all alone, Aubrey has everything she thinks she needs: SpaghettiOs and Sammy, her new pet fish. She cannot talk about what happened to her. Writing letters is the only thing that feels right to Aubrey, even if no one ever reads them.
She says she doesn't mind flying, and she loves boats! (I would imagine the faster the better!) Rumor has it that scooters and skateboards suffice as well! I overheard her say that she wouldn't CARE if she was stuffed in a box and MAILED somewhere -- as long as she gets to TRAVEL!
“To hell wiv all dat bollix for a day, Shane. Fook! You're leading da fooking countree, man... ya gotta say a propa goodbye, now... Sure ya can dis once share a little fix wi' me?”
And the son of a gun was always screaming at us, my brother and I, warning grandma that we were on the way to the yard, up to some mischief.
I have to admit I get a good chuckle out of sticking the word Occupy in front of words other than Wall Street or a particular city.
This has to be the best memory from the Great Outdoors!
As for prices, I don’t remember exactly how much, but I remember thinking that the price for fancy places like this was not cheap. We have to be careful how much we spend especially when we go to expat hangouts.
Though Zoe Tay’s husband Mr Chioh is an alumni of Henry Park Primary School, it was not his first choice and therefore Brayden’s admission raised some suspicions among unhappy parents that ‘foul play’ might be involved.
In bringing these terms together highlighting “augmentation” and “space” Manovich aptly captured and synthesized two convergent digital developments: mobile / wireless / locative media and Augmented Reality. But this is only one side of the story he’s telling us in this essay; an important part of it consists of an original reading of the history of visual arts as a history of expanding its display platforms from the gallery wall to the gallery space (installation art) to information space (interactive art), followed by diverse case studies of contemporary art, architecture, and urban design, ranging from Janet Cardiff’s audio walks to diverse manifestations of the “electronic vernacular” including DigitalSky in Hongkong, Robert Venturi’s “information surfaces” and Rem Koolhaas’ NY Prada Store. These examples allow Manovich to recast augmentation from a purely technological definition to augmentation as a theoretical concept and as a cultural and aesthetic practice.
It's a big yard and takes a good bit of maintenance, but each year I love to see it spring to life with lush green growing everywhere. But no matter how much of a hit or miss ~ no matter how mumble - jumble gardens (and life) can be, you can always find the pretty.
It is such a perfect herald to spring....sunny days ahead.
So instead of increasing that number and labeling herself a slut, Ally embarks on a quest to rediscover her old flames on the chance that she actually passed up Mr. Right long ago, or that perhaps some of them have changed over the years and may be right for her after all.
Mr. Speaker, I’m not anti-immigrant. My father was born in Mexico. My wife’s father was born in Wales. They came to this country. The idea that I’m anti-immigrant is repulsive.
1 Corinthians 1:25
In my next life I am sure to be a tile instillation expert considering that grout and I have officially become friends.
Dr. Dante gave a curt nod. Sam's father gave her a brief pat on the back and then headed out the door with the Baba Yaga at his heels.
What did you think? Please leave comments with your thoughts and reactions to ARMADILLO.
Rocks Glass Quantity Available:SOLD OUT
* This week has not been nearly as busy as last week was but its still not been 'typical.' Today will be the only day BOTH my parapro and I will be in the classroom together. I taught a behavior class one day and then sat through an inservice another afternoon. I'm glad the week is over.
His Holiness has boiled down his message to a very compelling core. As you know, I found his message compelling to begin with, because it parallels what can be seen and questioned in the world of measurable facts. Measurable facts are not everything, but if one’s message ignores the core realities of science it is not a compelling message at a time when we are killing the earth — because real things are real, including our responsibility to not kill the earth. Therefore, real things must be incorporated into any valid world view. I like to listen to His Holiness, especially if I’m feeling a bit stressed, so yesterday I listened once again, to a new version of the Four Noble Truths, spoken recently in New Delhi. I will summarize and paraphrase for clarity and hope that I do not mis-represent. He talked for about six hours:
The earlier deadline for FCCB buybacks was to expire today.
Mats Tunehag examines what factors determine the success or failure of business as mission. He argues that it’s important to remember our objective and refuse to compromise on professionalism, excellence and integrity.
Ae they celebrating Gay Masses?
Once inside, the air itself feels saturated with history and tradition. When I breathe it in, I feel part of something bigger than myself.
Cayden-Left/Ty-Right
It's gone. I chucked a tantrum last night and renewed my efforts to rid our house of Crap We Don't Need.
Other than Gasparilla, there will be beach time, boat time, and an NHL game thrown in for good measure.
Having said that, the problem of urbanization in the world today is that it's not urbanism in the classic sense. The real challenge is to make cities better as cities. I think Planet of Slums addresses the reality that every complaint made by sociologists in the 1950s and 60s about American suburbia is now true on an exponentially increased scale with poor cities: all the problems with sprawl, all the problems with an increasing amount of time and resources tied up in commutes to work, all the problems with environmental pollution, all the problems with the lack of traditional urban apparatuses of leisure, recreation, social services and so on.
3. The hot man that makes the heroine speechless. It seems that too many otherwise strong women are made into drooling schoolgirls in the presence of a gorgeous guy. You would think that all the paranormal romance worlds are filled with such awe-inspiring men.
This is the first rose on those little sticks of wood that are supposedly rose-shrubs. I watered the sticks every night for about 3 months.
TE: Anthony Fasano; Charles Clay; Michael Egnew; Jeron Mastrud; Will Yeatman; Les Brown
Spinach or other greens (shred)
If I set my mind to something, I HAVE to finish it. I've been like that since I was a little kid. Getting into programs in school, getting into my #1 choice college, getting a job in the career I wanted. It was never a question of "if" this is going to happen. I knew it would if I worked at it. So I approached my next big challenge with weight loss in the same mindset. I had just started my job right out of school and I knew if I didn't change my habits now, it would be MUCH harder later. New routine I had to get used to, new city, more money to buy healthy food and such. It was the ideal time to go for it. And I did 100%. It was pretty awesome that the weight came off without too much difficulty. It also helped that I didn't have much of a social life in DC yet, so I could focus and not eat out in restaurants too much. After about 9 months of successfully losing weight, I was down to around 155 in October of 2010 and I met my current boyfriend.
Disclaimer: I am in no way a quilting expert. I have learn solely from trial and error (emphasis on error) and reading on the internet. I have only made 4 quilt tops and have hand quilted 1 top and machine quilted 4 tops. I am not saying everything I do is the right way to do it, just sharing what I've picked up so far. You'll probably learn best by trial and error too ;-)
Note your additional entries in your comment as well as giving me an email address or some way to contact you if you win. I will be drawing the winner on July 27 during my next Women Who Rock Wednesday interview!
And as I look into the sky
So I drew a scene amongst the trees with a vardo (traditional travelling wagon) stopped at the laneside and its travelling folk collecting firewood and stoking the fire under a kettle for tea. Their horse grazes and the road winds on toward the horizon. This is the Atching Tan - the Stopping Place, the wonderful camp amongst trees - a place to relax and cook and wash, to find water and let the horses rest and the children play, to make repairs to wagons and to make contact with the locals for work and exchange of goods and services.
The musical path of Canadian guitarist Jamie Ruben is surely the story of the road less traveled. Rather than gigging regularly in some urban jazz hotbed, the Toronto-based guitarist made his living for seven years performing jazz full time in the Far East in such places as Katmandu, Bangkok, Shanghai and the even more remote regions of Siem Reap and Koh Samui, among others.
Community parks or playgrounds make great places to stop for lunch if you are traveling with children. It gives the kids something to look forward to during the morning, they can work off their pent up energy and they learn how to meet other kids. Sometimes the combination of lunch and exercise will result in a nap (theirs, not yours).
On December 8, 1991, the South African revolutionary Chris Hani stated: "The ANC does not hide its close ties with Cuba which has assisted the ANC and now needs help itself... The ANC has got very strong links with Cuba."
-She buys you a movie that you despise. And expects you to be thrilled about it.
I've been wanting to add watercolour portraits as an example for my 'custom portraits' section of my shop. Problem is, I don't really have an example of one. So I kind of just grabbed a random picture off the internet that appealed to me and painted it as an example.
(Copyright Lucy Coats 2009)
Some how, by being together, we were able to become more of ourselves side by side.
One can build a website with 3 easy steps- like choosing a design, customise it and go live. One can choose from over 2000 professional templates. Once the templates are selected you can easily add one’s own logo, graphics, photos and text. Later with the click of a one button one can publish to your website.
I have tried the pasta sauces from Dave’s Gourmet and make sure that there is at least one jar always ready on the shelf. But, there is also a complete collection of hot sauces, condiments, spices and snacks. If they are of the same quality as the pasta sauces, I know we are in for a real treat. While not all their products are “organic”, they are each made with ingredients I’d find in my own kitchen and lack unnecessary preservatives and chemicals. The website is organized into an “organic” section so you can easily find the products that fit that bill if it’s what you’re looking for. If you have a good friend named pasta, I think that he’d like to be joined by some Dave’s Gourmet pasta sauces the next time he shows up for dinner! Enjoy!
1 cup each green pepper strips and sliced fresh mushrooms
Little Yellow Bicycle and today, I share with you a couple of cards from
Observance of World Party Day recognizes peace and joyful expression as fundamental human rights, and celebration (party) as the opposite of war.
OLIVIA: It hadn't occurred to me.
What are some of your favourite things that start with the letter A?
"It was no more illegal for kids to drink heingemake (homebrew) than for adults, so we were allowed to join in the responsible and moderate use of the quaff. At the Meyers' house, as was common, the beer was bottled in one-fifth gallon bottles and served in an aluminum bucket, from which all partook.
“What now?” asked Emily.
Emma is a six year old little girl who is suffering from severe vaccine damage which has been verified by several leading experts. Emma is totally paralyzed and unable to move any part of her body. She cannot speak and breaths with the aid of a small tube inserted through a tiny incision in her windpipe called a tracheotomy.
SM: Well, I'm always writing new Mr Pants books. I have ten or so written and ideas for more. I'm also working on something totally different but that's not developed enough to discuss.
The horrifying - and blatantly racist - case of Trayvon Martin has brought this to the forefront for me recently. If you are unfamiliar with the case, please read about it before continuing. The basic gist is this: Travyon was a 17 year old black male who went to the store for some Skittles, and was followed - perhaps hunted - and gunned down by a Hispanic neighbor (initially thought to be White) who deemed him "suspicious." The mostly White police have thus far failed to charge the murderer. This is not the first such case ,and will not be the last. In some ways, I have become immune to the headlines; like an addict, I have built up such a tolerance for injustice that it takes a mountain to even prompt a major reaction. It's easy for me to simply scan the headlines and say "hmm, another Black kid was gunned down, no big shock, crazy world" and move on to my comfortable life. Like most people.
On the other hand, the disadvantages are a serious problem for today’s world. The Internet is causing one of the worst diseases – the Internet addiction. People are wasting their time taking part in the useless chats. We all can relate with spending long hours on social networks like twitter and facebook. In the end, we have little or no productivity. However, it’s good because we can talk with almost everyone from the furthest sides of our planet, but on summary – it’s not worth spending all our time.
Actually, for the thing about album reviews...that just needs to be a separate thing altogether.
PALO ALTO, CA – The suicide letter left by Stanford football has been criticized by the literary community for its “poorly cited” bibliography, prompting a series of back and forths between several journalists, literature publications and even members of Stanford’s own English department. Though there have been no outright accusations of plagiarism, the issue has nonetheless spawned an international outcry coming on the heels of the letter being shortlisted for the Samuel Johnson Prize for non-fiction.
Editor: “This isn’t really Vroom Vroom! – I mean Zoom Zoom! then.”
To those of you who have just recently joined us (it's great to have you here) I hope that you enjoy the linky party this week and please pop on over the the Design Teams blogs and say hi, we would love to come visit you too.
Prosecutors insisted the animal’s injuries had been “so gross and so obvious it would have been clear to anyone that failing to get treatment for the animal would cause it suffering.”
What seems weird to me is that Mrs. B kind of lied to me when she told me what happened that first day. Or, at the very least omitted certain key facts. And I guess I should be really angry about this, but honestly I just chalk it up to human nature. She was nervous and she felt responsible. She either did not want me to be angry or did not want to get into trouble, so she misconstrued the facts. I'm not happy about that, but I don't think she is a bad person or even a bad teacher. On the contrary; she's great with the kids and Oscar loves her. He trusts her; that's why he followed her back into the school.
And yes, suggestions for a title for this post, please. After a flat-out week at work, a Friday night drive up to Moray, and in the middle of a weekend of helping my now house-bound father with accumulated chores, I can't get beyond the laughably obvious. Sometimes I long for title-less posts.
LM: YES!!! I want an easy button.
I got so much accomplished -so so excited.
Definitely worth sparing the time.
7 Facts about me:
I’m so lonesome for you it’s a crime
This poem is purely fiction.
We are impossibly excited to be headed north, knowing that there will be bittersweet moments in the transition. There is so much to think about in the next month and I hope you'll excuse my necessary absence from this space. But, oh the adventures we'll have in Maine!
11. Devotional Theme (Dilruba by D.M. Tagore)
QUIRKS: Formulaic romantic comedy. However, the types of awkwardness that occurred once the plot started to develop were pretty unique. I’d say that from 10% into the movie until about 40% into the movie, this was a 4/5 star movie. But ultimately, it was a 3/5 star movie.
stretching into the pointed distance.
Since that time, those who have been baptized in Christ’s Church have received the Grace of God within themselves. We receive Christ’s gift of redemption and eternal life through His Church, which is His Body. It is in the Church that Christ bestows on us the saving fruits of His death and Resurrection. St. Symeon the New Theologian explains this beautifully:
Hope you have a great weekend, spending time with your family and love ones.
I also welcome like-minded individuals to join me on this gratitude journey, as I would love to share some powerful ideas on how by working together we can make a huge difference.
When picked in November the color is green, then slowly turns yellow - like on the photo.
Here are a couple pictures of the clouds building up and bringing us rain.
“This is one of those days where I wonder why I do this. Do you ever have a day like that? I start thinking about how much time all this blogging, commenting, writing, and promoting is taking, and it makes me wonder. Why?
"I'll drown more sailors than the mermaid shall; I'll slay more gazers than the basilisk (from Henry VI Part 3); "Would they were basilisks, to strike thee dead!" (from Richard III) and "It is a basilisk unto mine eye, Kills me to look on't." (from Cymbeline).
Wardrobe malfunctions; why do they always seem to happen at the most inopportune moment? It’s as if cosmic spite and shoddy tailoring have aligned to create instances of gross mortification almost exclusively at public outings. Let me explain.
These sketches and colour test show me looking for the sense of a character. It’s too early to say what he’s for, but I will say this is the first time I’ve worked with an author for ages. And there’s no doubt being an illustrator is slightly easier when it involves working to someone else’s specifications. Unless those specifications are crazy (happily not the
It moves us because we crafted the idea of United Classrooms to ensure that children across America and the world have the opportunities, knowledge, relationships and experiences it takes to live their fullest potential. This is not an easy task, but now the task at hand is held by a wide and echoing community of people who are invested in our children’s future.
Instead, I've felt the need to comment on the meaninglessness of a suggested gesture. And, you know, show the world (or my 11 readers) that I'm just an insensitive dick. Whatever.
"You seem to be blaming everyone Robin." Correct.
I learned several things about myself and Stormtroopers.
Each charm must be presented on a nice presentation so the the recipient knows who it was created by.
I coloured him with Promarkers, but actually paper-pieced his T-shirt. Now, I used digi papers for this card & whilst they looked great on my screen, printed off so much lighter than they should be & sadly much of the definition of pattern was lost along with the intensity & depth of colour. :( Needless to say, the soft pattern on the paper I used to piece his T-shirt is just not showing up on the photo at all so I might as well have not bothered. LOL. Ah, well! That aside, I think that an autumnal colour palette lends itself so well to a male card don't you? I also had the perfect sentiment to team with this image to go on the front & this was from Jedi a while back. Hope you all like it.
Gedichte 1853 Und 1854: Zum Lazarus: ‘Einst sah ich viele’
The more I think about it, the more I feel Williams should never be allowed back in the game. And as for the players, they’re lucky to just have been suspended, whether it be three games or a season. They’re lucky that Roger Goodell didn’t decide to make supreme examples of them—which with his “power” he easily could have. Maybe the commish did just enough, but in my opinion, player saftey can never be taken too lightly.
things today to see what would stick. I have a better idea now of the directions
There's no room for video-gamin' couch potatoes 'round here... when the steel stares you down, the only thing you can do is wait for the "beep" and send plenty of lead down-range. And folks, let me tell you... this new generation of "everybody wins" falls to the side like spent brass, 'cause everyone here has good, ol' safe fun... but those young cowboys definitely want to know who was the best.
But have you ever wondered what happens in the behind-the-scenes of a commercial?
The Long Standing Business Award (Also know as ‘The Marvin’) recognizes the contributions of the award winners for the long-term support of the Newport business Community. The award was named after the award’s first recipient Marvin Polinski owner of Sal’s Men & Boys. In honor of his long-term commitment and service to the Newport business Community.
"I am afraid the left side in politics have for too long failed to grasp that there are challenges with the new society that need to be discussed," she added.Paul Brennan (paulrbrennan) has been silent since court adjourned Friday.
Hubby: Those feet smell HORRIBLE. GEEZ
2. Editing. I've been reading Ebooks and I do spot the occasional oddity in most books but I've always suspected its due to the possible source of these Ebooks. These errors look like OCR issues and they are easily ignored (rn = m). This book however had a decent number of misspelled or misused words. The kind of thing where you stop and double check to make sure you are reading it correctly. I was surprised so many slipped through the editing process.
In 1901 Germany must gain three centers. Traditionally they are Denmark, Holland, and Belgium. At the same time it must insure England and France have come to blows over the English Channel. This diverts England’s eastern movement aimed at Scandinavia to one aimed southward at France. If this diversion cannot be accomplished in 1901, then France will gain most or all of England in the coming conflict. Germany’s progress towards a win is then thwarted unless a new target can be quickly found.
As I am almost finished with the interior decoration of my sister’s home, I called my sister to ask her permission to take pictures of her home. And she agreed!!
-Boots-Loft
Images show young troops who appear to be prisoners in handcuffs, wearing camouflage fatigues with no insignia; the broadcast also shows images of weapons (assault rifles, hand grenades, a recoilless rifle) that may have been captured. Lt. Ouedraogo finishes the statement, attributing it to Captain Amadou Haya Sanogo, who has not been seen on television since the unrest began yesterday.
an opossum so elderly,
My father’s side never tried to kidnap my sister and I when we were kids, sure, but in the true sense of the word, they were Others compared to how I interacted with my white side.
The children were about 10 years old. Sixteen autistic children classified as non-language-impaired achieved an average language ability score of ~100, right at the mean for the administered test. In contrast, nine autistic children classified as language-impaired scored ~65, more than two standard deviations lower.
So, I learned to “Follow the Smart Money”, recognize the trends in the market, and this really made a large difference in my trading. Over the years I have developed a high degree of accuracy and I would have to credit that not only to selecting the right candidates to trade, but also trading them in the right market environment.
Dallas. Fisher joined a bank run by the Harriman Brothers (Both
Shall I go straight? All clear ahead!
Today I have included a Pin-Up look of mine that is easy to duplicate, and may give you that sexy edge you were searching for. If not I hope you enjoy looking at the pictures, and maybe trying it out for fun.
There is no judgement: If you are a fitness rockstar, or if it is your first attempt at fitness, you are welcomed and treated nicely! Our instructors want to know what your goals are, and we want to help you reach them, period. As an instructor it is important to remember a couple of things: not every body is the same, not every person has the same fitness goals, and fitness can be really intimidating for some people. Simply by keeping these things in mind you can create a comfortable environment for everyone and STILL provide an amazingly challenging work out.
With epilepsy I work hard to keep
If you want to be famous then run for office and be a politician
So next time any veganist comes around mine they’ll get what I’m cooking. MEAT. Don’t like it, well go drink some tea’s with bacon in it!
But hey, this is Climate Science.
You can vote today and tomorrow. Two weeks ago we kicked St. Louis, MO out of the running and now we’ve advanced to battle Knoxville, TN.
The market is owned and opereated by a Mennonite family. They buy in bulk, and repackage items for sale so you generally get a cheaper price. It is so fun to visit the store, Little Monkey's favorite aisle is the candy aisle of course, but they also sell dried fruit, snacks, an assortment of flours, whole grains, homemade breads, pies, and pastries, homemade soups and salads, and butter, and of course gift items, and so much more. They also have a great deli where they make sandwiches and sell meats and cheeses. Outside you will find chickens, turkey's, peacocks, and an assortment of other birds, as well as goats. Here are a few pictures for you.
In bowl of stand mixer, add yeast, honey, and warm water. Give it a stir and let sit for 5-10 min til bubbly and foamy. Add salt, oil and 1 1/2 c flour. Mix using dough hook. Once combined, add additional flour 1/2 c at a time til slightly tacky, but doesn’t stick to hands. Turn on medium to knead for 6 min. The side of bowl should be clean and dough should be smooth. Remove dough from bowl. Spray bowl with Pam. Add dough back to bowl and turn once to get both sides coated with spray.
Children get an education whether they know it's an education or not. All these kids are learning lessons about all sorts of things, most only tangentially related to the music they think they're learning. I used to work, for hard money, sometimes with and for very hard people, in the music business, but I could never have dreamed up this very useful curriculum in what the music business is like. Laissez faire.
King: Scared? Don’t be silly.
The characters will likely again protest their innocence and the maiden will demand a test of them. Either they will be tested by cold water or they will be tried by combat. Again, she will agree to pay the price of the blood they spill if they succeed in the trial. She will tell them that a terrible creature dwells deep in the well. It is drawn forth by the light of the full moon, or the reflection of silver in moonlight upon the water's surface. The creature kills babies and bites people in their sleep, leaving them with boils and blisters for months afterwards, but never enters the mead halls, so the people sleep there while it eats their livestock.
At a distance you might have mistaken him for an electrician or a sewer-expert coming into view through one of those round holes in the sidewalk by which access is provided to the subterranean apparatus of cities. But, drawing nearer, you perceived that he was but half a man, who stood upon the six-inch stubs of what had once been a pair of legs. But what nature could do for what was left of him nature had done. He had the neck, the arms, and the torso of a Hercules. His coat, black, threadbare, shining, and unpleasantly spotted, seemed on the point of giving way here and there to a system of restless and enormous muscles. But that these should serve no better purpose than ceaselessly to turn the handle of an unusually diminutive and tuneless street-organ might have roused in the observer's mind doubts as to the wisdom and vigilance of that divine providence which is so much better understood and trusted by the healthy and fortunate than by the wretched, the maimed, and the diseased.Barbara's sometimes-love interest has firsthand experience with Blizzard, as does Bubbles, the charity-case orphan that she employs, but their warnings go unheeded. She is willing to make sacrifices for her art, and indeed develops a strange friendship with the repugnant fellow. Perhaps even a twisted attraction to him. Even her father, a reknowned surgeon, can't keep her away, and he has a dirty little secret all his own.
Firstly, if traditional, tourist Paris is what you are looking for, there’s a good chance this guide is not for you. If, on the other hand, you want to scratch a little beneath the picture postcard façade and discover the Paris that I have come to know and love, then read on.
2) Pericard. I can play better than he can and I’m nigh on seventy.
Game Nutz Podcast: Fillercast 1
Over the main entrance is a lead statue which could do with a bit of a clean. The date on the pedestal beneath the lady’s feet is MDCCVI (1706), revealing this to be one of our shortest reigning monarchs, Queen Anne. The statue originally stood on the previous Guildhall which Queen Anne extended.
So that was my Great Little Berlin Moment of today! Here are some pictures for you to enjoy and German speakers can read more here
I have not heard that before and it doesn't really ring true to me. While I could see how some separated brethren writing a Christmas carol would change a story from a King going out for Eucharist Adoration to something else, the separated brethren are not high on emphasizing charitable acts as a path to Heaven, either.
[...]Is God Just a Human Invention? is loaded with exceptional quotes from Christian and non-Christian thinkers. Additionally, the book furnishes very short essays at the back of each chapter from various erudite Christian scholars that augment the thesis of what was advanced by the authors.
If you will notice Paul’s concern was at least in part for the man to be delivered from this grievous sin. He was also very concerned with what it was doing and would continue doing if the rebelliousness and evil were not dealt with.
Gear handle goes all the way around wheel and makes a clicking sound.
Also, please feel free to come back often and visit the links of those people on the linkey machine - don't forget to leave a comment or feedback, everyone loves feedback. ;)
In Mississippi, "the state's corrections commissioner on Friday said that [the GEO Group] would no longer operate three [private prison] facilities in the state, which held 4,000 inmates," NPR reported recently. Regrettably, Mississippi is seeking another contractor instead of taking their management in-house or downsizing youth facilities, as Texas has done.
He is now a bishop and sought after by the rich, Roman peerage of Britannia for his wondrous ‘miracles’. Claudius cannot help but laugh. These sheep do not know the difference between God’s work and dark magic. He is now bored and covets a new title: archbishop to the Roman city of Eboracum. When he kills the previous possessor of that position, Claudius realizes he made a mistake when he allows a boy who witnesses the murder to live.
I'm going to start with my absolute all time favourite. Every time I revisit this photo in my folder, I swoon just a little. I love the dark wood counter tops, the pendant lighting, the pops of white china against that greeny-grey in the open shelving, the pull handles, the shaker style cabinets, the dark flooring... just everything. No idea where this is from unfortunately! If anyone knows, please share because I would love to see more of the kitchen or the house if possible!
So, a few basic things I like are the make up, the audio, the scenery, and the cast. Every character’s make up is phenomenal, and they all play their part very well. I don’t know how I feel about the nonchalant attitude the adults have toward the game, but I guess that’s the point. The film had a perfect amount of gore – I kept my burrito down. I thought it was going to be full of bloody kids beating the shit out of each other but it was tolerable. There were a few thrilling, suspenseful moments that kept me at the edge of my seat. Im pretty sure there was this awesome moment when my friend and I yelled, “Oh shit!” at the same time during a fight scene. There are a few tear jerkers strategically placed throughout the film that really pulled you in to the story. I really liked how you got a good connection with every main character, and you just couldn’t help but feel like shit every time the sound of the cannon went off, signifying a kid had died.
Last year, invited by a guy I’d photographed singing in his punk band, I went up to Edinburgh for the Scottish Tattoo Convention. As a portrait photographer who loves faces, seeing all these people covered in piercings, tattoos and more than a few outlandish hairstyles, I felt like a kid in a cookie factory (click here for the blog post about it).
Sally and I spent an afternoon looking at my wardrobe for Paris, which was strewn about her dressing room, calculating the right look to wheedle my way into a show. Italian black cowboy boots I bought in Rome in the mid-eighties, a tweed skirt of Chanel fabric purchased at Maupiou in Paris and designed together with my seamstress Oksanna, a black slim-fitting 1940s-styled cashmere coat with a wide, black mink collar, and the pièce de résistance — the black, bias cut silk chiffon scarf with feathers from Ron. Sally and I both knew to avoid looking like an American dressed to the nines in labels. You’ll be in the fashion capital of the world, said Sally. If you need anything to add to your wardrobe, you’ll have all of Paris to shop!
7) Anansi Boys, by Neil Gaiman. I loved this book about brothers behaving badly and magic an unreasonable amount. It is a standalone companion to Gaiman's American Gods, and I preferred it. My review, however, was terrible. An excerpt: "This book is good.
Once a month, however, the spa organizes a lounge soirée, staying open until midnight with mood lighting, a live DJ, and $5 martinis. We weren’t sure what the atmosphere would be like, but we were willing to give it a go.
THE EPILOGUE
So offline does not equal online, yet.
San Francisco safety Donte Whitner weighed in on that this week when he said the following.
As the moments passed we both seemed to begin to relax. Questions that both of us had carried for years were asked- and answered. One thing that is important to me that you know is- quite often people somehow believe that a child placed for adoption is 'unwanted'. While I know that every story is different I also believe that often that is the farthest thing from the truth. Aleigha was placed for adoption for one reason and one reason only- poverty.
You know the awkward guy that invites himself to the party only to end up being a total killjoy when he shows up? The technical term for that shall forever be known as being a “Red Arrow.”
We spent hours just talking about everything.
Soya sauce, 1 table spoon
John Lewis is a company without shareholders, whose value is vested in a Trust and can only be shared between the company's employees. This is quite distinct from a standard corporation which allows its employees to buy some of its shares while its management is free to inflate profits by risky endeavours or extract value in bonuses. While John Lewis employees receive a share of the profits they generate, employees of share ownership schemes might find, like the employees of Enron, that they lose not only the value they created but also their jobs and their pensions.
Be nice or be nasty…….. Be happy or be lonely…….
For my money, there's not a dime's worth of difference in the nutritive value of the 2 meals, but the Panera one is much more dishonest. In my mind a half sandwich half salad lunch should be way better for me than a double cheeseburger and fries. If I'm not informed of my caloric or sodium intake, I might be more willing to splurge a little for dinner and have some chocolate cake for dessert or eat a heavier meal and still think I didn't go over what I should be eating in a day.
My first guess was that they were gun emplacements, looking much the same as the ones I was used to seeing in the Thames Estuary when I lived in Kent and, following that logic, the large grass circles were the remains of traversable heavy artillery. We continued Northward though, deferring proper investigation to the return journey.
- Showcase your ShowMe’s online at ShowMe.com and share your knowledge with your students, friends, family, or the world!
If you’re interested in applying, please contact our casting producer immediately and email photos of you and your property to:
In a report designed to prove the feasibility of measuring electrodermal activity on subjects going about their daily life, at least one student showed near brain-death during class. Explains A LOT. Especially why students sometimes take off their socks and play with their toes.* BECAUSE THEY ARE TRYING TO SURVIVE.
Its passage towards light is written on fragments of a dark star
(Student did not answer)
I have met a man, too, who is tall, strong and tender. His name is Karl. He sort of reminds me of my past, because I have told him all about it. Being around him is the least painful thing about my day. His voice takes me to places I thought I’d never reach. His touch is like a drug that I cannot have enough of. He does not think I am ordinary, but I think I am. Everything about me is ordinary. And oh, it hurts to be that far from perfection!
I cursed under my breath and away from the phone. Not just
After dinner last night, Eric went out of his way to stop by Starbucks. He wanted to replace a mug of mine that he broke last month. I love ceramic travel mugs. While they don't sell the one that broke anymore, Eric picked out exactly what I would have chosen.
* Relocation: For constructing a dam, relocation of the human and animal population of that area is required.
His struggle to reconcile modernity and Britishness was rather like Piper's. Nash tried abstraction, but quickly returned to the painting of natural forms - stones, leaves and trees. Although he greatly admired (and in some cases knew personally) Picasso, Max Ernst, de Chirico, Magritte and other modern artists, he continued to find inspiration in nature and constantly sought subjects in the British landscape that reflected his inner preoccupations; his discovery of Avebury in the summer of 1933 was part of this quest. His frequent journeys to France, including a hilarious jaunt around the Riviera with a young Edward Burra, were also part of the process.
The package depends on the package
Groundhog Day. Hmph. The implications leave me uneasy at best, at worst distraught in a seriously dishevelled, crazy-eyed, whimpering spin. Groundhog Day actually makes me feel a little affronted, especially when it comes upon me unawares, as it does, because who remembers Groundhog Day is coming?
We think this is a great way to celebrate our blogiversary (bloggiversary?), and we hope you’ll join us and contribute a piece for the contest. If you ARE interested in participating, leave a comment here or email us at trueclassicsblog (at) gmail dot com!
I stand at 3'6" tall and no amount of weight loss will ever have me looking like Angelina Jolie, or Catherine Zeta Jones. Of course, I could look better, I do realize that. But I'm happy for the most part with my body. Except for the big boobs. I don't want cancer and pray I never go down that road personally, but I am interested in learning more about breast reduction. Right now my chest area looks like two huge utters off of a dang cow and it's not pretty people! I knew I should have worn a better support bra when I was younger.
You are loved by an almighty God,
I prophesy to you that the Feast of Trumpets will birth a new season that will come into full manifestation and go forth in great strength into 2012. This will be the beginning of God’s government becoming very, very apparent to us. The blessings of that government will come when we are living under His rule. We are equipped by those things that He gives to us and made ready to go all the way into this new thing that God is going to do. You don’t want to miss out on it.
There is worry, stress, late nights, early mornings, cleaning, cooking, little privacy...
This candy will run till 8pm on thursday 29th March and I will announce the winner on friday 30th March. New candy will be posted on Saturday 31st.
I thank you for the minimal understanding of the Trinity that I have, through my study of Scripture and others’ writings. I thank you for the faith that you have given me, that I believe what I cannot fully understand. If I only believed what I understand, I wouldn’t believe much at all, for there is much that I do not understand. But I believe that you are God, three in one, Father, Son, and Holy Spirit. I believe that all three exist simultaneously, but in different essence, and that somehow, my spirit is inhabited by your Spirit.
JESUS!!!!!
Draw close, God’s beloved son
Now in my thirties, my priorities to myself and to others have shifted. My son motivates me to find new ways to nurture and love. My job motivates me to push myself and find ways to add value to the work that I’m producing. The people closest to me provide me with a motivation to stay strong and true to the woman that I’m becoming. I work hard every day to try and take one step closer to each of the goals that I have laid out for myself.
Right, I'm off to go and crack open my Moleskine book and battle with the blank pages :)
Which is where the reference to Portsmouth comes in. Deloitte point out that for the Premier League clubs en masse the wages /revenues ratio has risen to a worrying 67% (3), but this rather hides the variance individual clubs have. Here are the ratios over five seasons:
Head on over to Laura’s blog for the start of the Spies, Murder and Mystery Marathon. You won’t want to miss this sizzling series as we head into summer. Stock up on some great thrilling reads! If you dare…
Sony became abominable for over-promising and under-delivering. The PSP was declared to be a groundbreaking beyond of technology that would alter the Bold Boy, iPod, and carriageable DVD amateur with one unit. It would accept PS2 aloft graphics, analog controls, and a library of amateur & movies that rivaled its animate cousin. Instead it became a bulky, brittle beyond of accessories that had a abbreviate array life, animation that fit about amid the Nintendo 64 and the Dreamcast, adulterated ascendancy inputs, and not one, but two big-ticket proprietary media devices: UMD and Anamnesis Sticks. UMDs were slow, pricey, and inefficient, and if you already endemic a cine on DVD and capital to watch it on the PSP, your abandoned options were either to buy it again, or watch it as a low resolution 368×208 mp4 file.
Ale Stars, you see, usually has a theme, be it a beer style a beer type or beers from a particular brewery. But this time things were different. In fact, I bet if you asked a thousand beer lovers if they’d like to pop over for a ‘slide night’ you’d get a thousand answers ranging from “I’m washing my hair” to “piss off you idiot”.
I do not believe in reincarnation. I believe that we have one physical life to live and I want control over my one life. I know what I want to see and I know what I want to do. I am at wits end with conforming to society and the social constructs that have been built up telling me what is practical and when the right time. I want to experience all that the world has to offer.
Starring: Sarah Jessica Parker, Pierce Brosnan, Greg Kinnear, Kelsey Grammer
If I could round up all my antique tools I would have shot those. I love the sense of history and thinking about what was made with them and who worked with them. But I also love these Victorian condiment sets. Two isn't much of a collection but I will add more as I find them. I like the ones that aren't perfect and/or complete because I think I will find or make lids for them and perhaps find some lone bottle looking for a set. And there is a huge price difference between the pristine perfect ones and the incomplete or slightly damaged sets. Both of these were under $50 and the better sets are around $300.
The post is about how God will heal the heart of a woman no matter what situation she is in, but it is NOT saying that a woman should stay in a situation that is either verbally or physically abusive or one in which your spouse is living in adultery.
1: they had authors who were sending them query letters and they could actually find books within the pile that they could possibly sell to the publisher.
Imagine finding your first love, only to be ripped apart by the apocalypse. Peyton Anderson will never forget the day she was forced to make a choice--between her family--and Chris Parker, the boy she'd given her heart. Now, four years later, as she steps from the fallout shelter and into a dead and broken world, he's the only thing on her mind.
What are you currently reading? What is a book that you’ve read recently that you’d recommend and why? And lastly, what’s your favorite book? (Because I’m sure we’d all love some more recommendations, as if we all don’t have continuously growing “to-be-read” piles!)
I did something out of my comfort zone yesterday and entered my novel In Search of Beef Stroganoff in a contest. The rules were easy – the piece had to be unpublished and the writer unrepresented by an agent.
What He can do, is uphold your right to do whatever you wish, and He does. He will protect your right to ignore His Son, Jesus and all that Jesus has done for you on and off the cross. He will uphold your right to reject all that is holy, right, and good. However, this is not what He wants. God doesn’t want anyone to perish. His desire and will is that all come to repentance (2 Peter 3:9). God wants everyone to receive the healing work that Jesus made available to all. Is. 53:4-5 “By His stripes we are healed. ( 3 John 2) Beloved, I pray that you may prosper and be in health, just as your soul prospers.” Do you see in this scripture how God wants you to prosper as well as be in health?
As brand new infant clothes were hung,
So while you are getting festive and putting all that wrap you worked so hard on in the recycling bin and cleaning the microwave for the 10th time....I hope you get a chance to take in all the good stuff with the ones you love. And this song is perfect for under the mistletoe.
One is led to believe that Yeats never quite got over his first love despite numerous affairs, nuptials and attempts to extricate himself from the continuum of those unrequited feelings. In time, his poetry began to reflect the seismic shifts in his personal as well as his political life. Much of his later work adopted a bleaker, more disillusioned voice lamenting the state of Ireland’s cultural landscape and the emergence of the Irish Free State. Paradoxically, this antiquarian bard with a love of esoteric mysteries was the most contemporary of his peers and the one who still resonates most profoundly with our present anxieties and disillusionments. Yeats’ new take on things is most clearly encapsulated in September 1913, with the resounding refrain, “Romantic Ireland’s dead and gone, It’s with O’Leary in the grave.” Later still, Yeats’ work once again took on a more personal vein; his subjects began to include his children and the onslaught of senescence. In the poem The Circus Animals’ Desertion, published in his last collection, Yeats describes the inspiration for these works by saying: “Now that my ladder’s gone, /I must lie down where all the ladders start /In the foul rag and bone shop of the heart.” All in all, Yeats was an incredible poet with an incredibly interesting but torturous life which makes me think that John Berryman’s desire to be Yeats rather than be like him was somewhat misplaced because I get the distinct impression that oftentimes even Yeats didn’t want to be Yeats.
Just think this stone the sea; and we two ships,
After measuring the space, I went to HD to get some wood cut.
Created by a mom, her daughter, and their friend.
Landscape photo taken from Dunston Staiths, looking towards Dunston and the CWS Soap Works (on the left of the picture). This image 'shows the reduced inner staith and the complete outer staith, at the time of the Garden Festival.'
This year was more of a books and writing weekend, and it was delightful fun to share that with her. She just finished The Hunger Games (as have I recently), so we went to that together last night. I loved it, and so did she. I confess I screamed like a little girl and jumped approximately 18 feet when the big scary dog jumped out. McKenzie did not. She was calm, cool, and collected, patting my arm and saying "It's okay, Mom... it's just a movie." Yep. I'm so brave.
down here,
At this time of year we've been aware of a lot of activity by orange/red beetles on flower heads of cow parsley, hogweed and ragwort when out walking the dog.
The carp play the harp
Imagine how authentic your hospital corners would look on this bed. The photos have been styled extremely well too by the people of Moderni Designs.
Hello Peeps ~ I hope you had a wonderful weekend! We have an extended one, so I'm late getting a post done for this morning.
In October, Nehru was nominated as the Congress candidate for presidency. As with Jinnah and Das, he was elected unopposed. Jinnah died of tuberculosis before Nehru’s inauguration. While Nehru publicly said ‘the light has gone out of our lives’, the reality was that he saw this as a new dawn.
I am wondering if I should even attempt to write this post now. Right now, while the big end-of-conference Dance Party rages on in the Student Union building outside my windows, I am busy packing. Yes, I went to the party for a while, but I knew when it was time to leave (a gift of insight that comes to you in your 40s, I believe).
In the same manner, we the Geek Girls, the Digital Divas, the Women in IT (and so on), we do not have to ascribe to purely geeky stereotypes. Why do I make this point? Well, as a proud woman in IT, I went to the spa today and was pampered for 2.5 hours. That’s right, I work in IT and like to look pretty!
And thank you everyone, for hanging in here with me, even when I am unfortunately not here to post as often as I would like. Knowing that you understand, and are here when I return, touches my heart.
I want to thank all of you for helping in making The Backworlds launch so visible this week. I have to say, it was incredibly awesome and flattering.
“As ‘Citizens of the World,’ we have shown what can be done when people come together and work collectively towards a common goal. Our program is a testament to that, and we are thrilled to be able to celebrate this exciting time with our guests at the Citizens of the World fundraiser.”
“Finally,” Ozymandias told me, “in 1969, Bill was employed as one of a group who were paid to go and kill Colonel Gaddafi in Libya. But they were stopped at London Airport by the British security services and the private company they worked for was closed down. Because of his experience, Bill was persuaded by the British authorities to join the SAS and was immediately sent to Ireland 1969-1973.
I really like a man who can open up and talk about himself. I can sit on a couch with a glass of wine and talk all night long with some music playing in the background and it would be a perfect night. Mercenary Guy did not like talking about himself. At all. He never really opened up. He told me honestly that it would be difficult for him and it certainly was. I just needed more of him. I needed to see him outside the context of my home. I needed him to let me into his world, and into his heart if he wanted me to give mine to him.
** I am on a roll with the word-inventing here
It would also be nice if, in addition to being a teensy little bit more studious, she would pay me on time. In the five months that I’ve taught her, she has only paid me on time once. Two months ago, she paid me approximately three weeks late. This also frustrates me because I am getting my salary late not because of bureaucratic red tape but because some smart ass was too lazy to draw money from the ATM. “I did not have time,” is a terrible and invalid excuse because she lives two blocks away from West Mall, which has two ATMs right beside the MRT station. And if she actually meant that her mother did not have the time, then that is even worse. As an adult, how can one be so irresponsible?
1. That I am the plaintiff in Civil Case No. 8022 filed before Branch 57 of the Regional Trial Court of Angeles City;
While traveling around the state of Arizona our chances of seeing a dust devil or two are very good. A dust devil is a robust, shapely, and fairly long-lasting whirlwind which can be as small as a few meters to over 1000 meters tall. The basic movement for a dust devil is usually a rising motion from the ground. For the most part, dust devils are not dangerous, but there has been that unusual time they increase big enough to cause harm to people and land. Sometimes they are compared to tornadoes, but dust devils manifest in sunny circumstances during calm weather and almost never get to the extreme force of a tornado.
10) Sometimes when the whole world is upside down and topsy turvey... the only thing to do is to play ping pong.
I still have to wonder, though – is this a place that time forgot, or just a place that man forgot?
DA Horizons is described as a business imprint.
‘Kagi no Kakatta Heya’ is based on a mystery novel by Kishi Yuusuke. It tells the story of an employee of a major security firm (Ohno), who is solving the mysteries related to cases that happened behind closed doors. His job is to find out how the perpetrator entered the locked room and how he managed to leave it under such circumstances. He’s the best fit for the job, because he’s personally obsessed with keys and locks and even goes as far as claiming that ‘there are no locks that cannot be broken’. At first glimpse he looks like a calm and collected guy, but in the heat of solving the mystery behind a locked room he’s burning with an incredible tenacity. He’s an unconventional hero who is helping with cases one request after another.
Preceded by: Journey's End - Followed by: 2009 Specials
to burst from their crusty shells;
Interitum.
What they do know is some book theory and what they think that the American public wants to hear. For many, Barack Obama included, they have never ventured very far into the "real world" and they know little else.
I now find myself in a place
Grant Hart All of my senses US
Ink-Chocolate Chip, Printer Ink (black)
So, I started clicking through the numerous articles linked to that main headline in my news reader. The second headline I clicked was a little more descriptive than the original:
Consciousness-Analogues
(c) It makes the gluten elastic.
Prize: THE CRONING by Laird Barron. If you're a total wuss about scary books (and this is well-shelved in dark/horror/scary as hell) we'll find you another book.
This PP is awesome to fussy cut! I really loved working with it. Don't forget to sign-up to see my
Stay tuned for upcoming posts including:
I don't know if we will make it but I am trying, even if it hurts.
They say goodbye and Felix is sent back through the Dimesh Portion.
I’m taking a break from posting blushes today, just in case you guys are getting bored =P Believe it or not, I’m actually not done posting up my entire US haul, which actually happened in Jan/Feb.. lol.. Procrastination should be my middle name.
I know, I know, not very pro-looking, but IT'S A UNICORN. IT'S RAINBOW. My deepest wish has been fulfilled (and I swear it's now out of my system, for good... maybe).
like the heart throat way the sparrow sings,
I've watched DVDs, slept, felt sorry for myself, attempted a jigsaw and got cross with myself trying to put the sky together because it was just 100 pieces of blue and frankly I don't have the patience for that. I've groaned and sniffed and gargled and nearly fallen asleep in the bath. I've been very poor company for the brilliant friend that came round and spent a whole day with me, patiently shouting out crossword clues as I lay half dozing in bed, making my tea and waiting for about an hour while I painfully tried to swallow it, and listening to me moan. I don't do suffering quietly or well, and my tonsils have I'm sure been the most infected tonsils ever to grace the back of anyone's throat.
He tossed her the bag and she left. One the shorter men slapped her butt. She was about to object but kept walking. Andrew stared at her mirroring the same shock I felt. I wanted to save her, she didn’t deserve this. She was too innocent. But I didn’t come here for that, hopefully she’ll be free after I’m done.
Nature’s Challenge: Get outside and pick one plant, tree or flower, set your alarm for 30 minutes, and focus your mind on only this object. You might be presently surprised.
He’s made fun of my brother because of his Down’s Syndrome. If he did that, he's even more of an ass than I thought. But I still don't see why the President should call you.
I have cut my button holes so the button will sit and be sewn on diagonally.
This is great option to running Cat 5, if you can use them. The bridges need to be on the same electrical circuit. This may not be the case in large or renovated buildings. Otherwise, they can save many man-hours and expense.
A catalyst for positive change; for the life and the reality we really desire.
What the satirists—and many of her critics—miss, however, is the essence of what makes her so successful. Strangers swear by Orman’s advice, and not necessarily because she is the “smartest” financial expert on the tube. But she is the one they invariably turn to for counsel because they trust her to have their backs. They sense that she cares about them. They believe that Orman is more than a financial planner or a broker you go to see in an office. She is a loyal friend who appears in their living rooms. Orman is neither a Pollyanna nor a doomsayer. She is a pragmatist. She tells people the truth, what they need to hear but not always what they want to hear. In an era when flimflam artists abound, people respect Orman, and more important, they know that she is on their side.
Today, I have one year of intentional sobriety, that includes weekends. My mouth still waters when I say the word bourbon, when I romance the booze. Over ice. Undertones of vanilla and oblivion. I miss it some days. Those days are fewer than they were. The without-it part is too good. Sobriety suits me. I came to sobriety gutted, lost, broken, willing to do anything. All of those wishes I had last year have come true, the psychic had that right. And not always in the way I imagined they would be granted. It has been a fucking hard year, but the saying, "Suffering is inevitable, but misery is optional." I get that now. I get it.
Marion, Kerri, Louise and Bambi all sent me cards(and flowers) and have been my cheer up club.
In one circumstance this weekend, I saw a parent threaten to put, and then put their child in a "time out." I don't think we've ever done that, but I've seen it done plenty of times. The first time I saw it was within my own family; I had never heard of the expression "time out" used that way before, where a parent threatens to physically remove the child from active engagement with something stimulating into solitary and quiet confinement. I can only assume that putting a child in a time out is an attempt to correct some aspect of the child's behavior that the adult finds enervating, disturbing, or unacceptable; in other words, when the child fails to live up to the adult's expectations. I wrote about expectations a year or so ago, and I think that overall expectations can be dangerous and tricky things. It's sad to see expectations of the parent forced upon a child this way.
Level 20: 40% chance to deal 150% damage after an attack.
Despite all the criticism of the presidential vacations, especially Michelle and Sasha's recent summer trip overseas to Spain's ritzy Costa del Sol, Obama still has some catching up to do when compared to the days that former president Bush was out of town, mostly at his ranch in Crawford, Texas.
Don't we just look like we are having such a great time?
Walking down the halls of the hotel, which was teaming with athletes even at 4am, I came across a group of guys chatting. They saw me coming and stopped talking. I must've looked a hot mess - hair all tangled, eyes red and searching for a smoke like a frickin crack whore! Luckily, they took pity on me and one of them went into the room, coming out with two cigarettes and his arm for me to hold as he ushered me outside to the carport.
SEAL reference: Problem Solving
Just one more thought: if your good employees are leaving for more lucrative positions because they can beat out the competition for them, who does that leave in your company?
With no real malice intended, quite often fellow runners say to me, "you're not the runner you were, are you, Terry? With two fingers forming a "V" either side of my nose, I point out that I am 63 and the years of competition have taken something of a toll.
For the fate of the sons of men and the fate of beasts is the same. As one dies so dies the other; indeed, they all have the same breath and there is no advantage for man over beast, for all is vanity. All go to the same place. All came from the dust and all return to the dust. Who knows that the breath of man ascends upward and the breath of the beast descends downward to the earth? I have seen that nothing is better than that man should be happy in his activities, for that is his lot. For who will bring him to see what will occur after him? Ecclesiastes 3:19-22 (NASB)
The recipe below is a basic focaccia recipe, I’ve added a handful of spring onions, a few halved cherry tomatoes and a peppering of olives. It is more of a visual delight so put in as many or as little as you like. How you paint your bread with colour and ingredients is up to you.
I've noticed that there often seems to be a favourable connection between birds and fashion. Bird prints grace fabrics, and (sustainably sourced/ vintage) feathers prove a fine trim or texture for all manner of garments. The image of Ginger Rogers swirling across the set clad in ostrich feathers in ‘Top Hat’ demonstrates just how seductive a material they are. The bird is also an appropriate metaphor for the process of dressing – especially when concentrating on colourful and exuberant wardrobes. Many of us are creatures who, myself included, enjoy choosing and showing off our plumage. Tassels, trims, sequins, buttons and ribbons are all forms of adornment. Aside from the practicality of dressing for warmth, the human body presents a myriad of ways to be clothed and decorated. Unlike birds, we change these feathers on a day-to-day basis – transitioning from sparrows to parakeets according to mood or whim.
And that’s how they win their kingdom.
Serve with potatoes and veggies.
I am often asked what I do with my weekends. Indeed with few friends a whole lot of time, what do I do?
Running in the early morning on the boardwalk is a great way to both get shots I would never otherwise encounter and satisfy my inability* to sit still for long. I even got a SpiBelt – the runner’s fanny pack – to carry my phone. I can now officially be described as an “active geek”, according to “Geeky,” the Spibelt reviewer. This is in contrast to the geek I saw on the beach with his tripod, sitting and waiting for the moment the sun crested the horizon. I, on the other hand, glanced to the left, paused briefly to withdraw phone, and got this shot. He may be able to mount his picture on the wall, but I still have proof I was there. And I got a workout in with a friend. Make that “social active geek.”
02. Working For The Weekend
I had the opportunity to take some newborn shots last week. A friend of a friend booked a lia sophia party with me this fall and during the party I was talking about my hobby. She called me later to set something up. This was my first time doing the newborn thing. My uterus might have skipped a beat or two. :)
Rehabilitation is an important part of recovering from stroke. The aim of a rehabilitation program is to help the patient regain as much independence as possible. This does not mean that life will return exactly as it was before the stroke. Rehabilitation cannot cure damage to the brain, but rehabilitation can help relearn the best possible use of the body. No one can say exactly how long a stroke rehabilitation program should last. Each program is tailored to meet each stroke survivor’s individual needs. A program can also change as thee patient’s condition improves.
This was their Club Sandwich....a bit sloppy but it was good....
Speaking of plants, we labeled the parts of a plant during a little whole group activity this morning after reading this book….
Acupuncture.
Timestamp: 2011-12-06 03:49:00 UTC
For I refuse to risk it all
Jewish tradition has it that the reason God created the Jews was to bring the message of ethical monotheism (that is, the concept of a single Supreme Being who is fundamentally concerned that humans choose good and reject evil) to Mankind. This God demands we first pursue Justice, which is a different perception from the Christian view of a God of Love. The God of the Jews does not demand that everyone be Jewish; He promises a place in the afterlife to the righteous of all faiths; contra-wise, a Jew who does evil will not be saved. Thus the Jewish dogma is fundamentally at odds with the Christian assertion that the sole path to salvation lies in accepting Christ into your heart. The Christian does not believe he can earn his way to Heaven through good deeds, although there is likely to be a linkage that will encourage the true Christian to perform good deeds. In other words, the Jewish God demands that Man be good; the Christian God demands that Man be Christian, and it follows that the true Christian will in fact be good, albeit (like all humans) fallible.
Fair nuanced shake
Still, just one stray emotion can so quickly become
St Paul the Apostle also spoke gently when he discovered the people of Athens worshipped idols. “Men of Athens, I perceive that in all things you are very religious…” this was quite a nice way of rebuking idolatry.
7) “I usually dim down a tungsten lamp if I want it to match a household practical source.” (The color temperature of the tungsten bulbs is slightly cooler than typical bulbs found in most houses.)
Before I knew it I was defending our friend saying how we each have different priorities. She has always been an 'on demand' mother, I trained my daughter in a schedule that meant she slept for the right amount of time, ate the right amount of times and have basically made people adhere to her schedule if they want to see her! I wish I could have been as relaxed as our friend (whose babies also eat and sleep the right amount!) but I needed to put her in a routine so I could feel secure I was doing things right.
2. FEEL the bar - this you don't have to do with wine unless you're into Champagne baths..
I don’t need to provide a detailed list of incentives to get your partner to display the desired actions. Use your imagination, based on what you know (or learn) about what motivates them. Dogs are motivated by attention and treats. A man may be motivated by a new sexy lingerie, where as a woman may be motivated by flowers delivered to her office once a month. That brings me to one more crucial point. This technique only works if both people have the desire to please the other person. As heartbreaking as it might be, if your partner does not show any indication of doing what it takes to show you the behavior you need for fulfillment, it may be time to consider finding a partner who does have that desire. You can only train a dog, or human, who has the desire to be trained. But the responsibility is yours and yours alone to let your partner, friend, colleague or whomever what it is that you want and need. If you have a hard time answering that question, begin by asking yourself what makes you smile. If that doesn’t start providing some answers, take the love language test in Mr. Chapman’s book to give you some ideas.
Round Rock Thomassens 2
Gone With the Wind, Margaret Mitchell
orchestra! The fees of the musicians were donated to UNICEF.
X-ref: No info.
I have used the new paper range from Kaisercraft 'Magnolia Grove'. This paper is just stunning.
1/1/2011 – 1/31/2011: -7.23%
Now! Your giveaway today is Alicia Simpson's third cookbook, Quick and Easy Low-Cal Vegan Comfort Food! Or rather, the promise of a cookbook. The Experiment Publishing will send the giveaway winner a copy of this cookbook upon its release in early January. Many thanks to The Experiment! Doesn't that cover make you want to know more? Much more?
This stout pours absolutely jet black with no light penetration. A small dirty brown head sits on top of the beer. This is a gorgeous looking stout. I served just below cellar temp to give this a chance to warm up a bit. The nose is really nice on this offering with plenty of roasted grain, bitter and rich chocolate notes, coffee, and black licorice. Once the beer warmed past cellar temp though plenty of hot alcohol notes quickly came on and overtook everything smelling like fingernail polish. The flavor profile starts out with plenty of bitter chocolate notes, light espresso, dark fruit, oats, and roasted grain. The alcohol I smelled in the nose comes across in flavor profile in the finish. I do have to say the that chocolate flavor tastes like they used good chocolate, and didn't skimp on that aspect like some other chocolate stouts that I've tasted. The mouthfeel is velvety smooth from the oat addition with very low carbonation. It isn't nearly as viscous as some other stouts, but I like that actually. I do start feeling the warming alcohol though as I get near the bottom of this bomber. The drinkability is quite nice with how easy to drink this was both in the flavor profile and on the mouthfeel.
The water, air, a flurry of green-cud grass,
Also, if we remember the events of spring 2011 in Bahrain, when the ruling Sunni regime launched a bloody crackdown on Shiite protesters, the case went almost unnoticed in the U.S. The reason was that Bahrain serves as one of the most important bases for the U.S. Fifth Fleet.
1/3 c. Sorghum flour (or Brown rice flour) 1/2 c. Almond flour
I prayed fervently that evening, even posting a Facebook status asking my friends to pray for a miracle as well. I though for a second, but why God? Whyyyyyyyyyyyyyyy?(sobbing dramatically)
His name was Richard Jewell.
Perhaps you are as confused as I am by the picture above, one that appears to put the lovely young Sigourney Weaver's face upon the body of a child. Ah, the magic of the theater! The future film star was in her late 20s when she joined this peculiar production of the 'Titanic' tragedy, written by her friend and frequent collaborator Christopher Durang.
49. Yellowbirds - The Color
Well, I will give everyone news of the mock election (with Susan Marlowe CPA as a candidate) very soon. In the meantime, I will just let you know that our party did really well and my grandkids got great grades. That’s the main thing that counts after all.
I have been motivated by reading the new blog from my friend, Art. He is currently going through a training program for the Monument Avenue 10k. He has some struggles, but he is seeing some amazing improvement and it is inspiring.
little foundation it has & landing
Predator (Alien Hunter): WS 5, BS 5, S 4, T 4, W 2, I 7, A 4, Ld 10, Save 4+/4++
NIGHTTIME SLEEP
I feel sad.
Pressure is especially high to develop new government revenue and legislators have indicated that removing tax advantages is more palatable than raising rates. But beyond that, why is the insurance tax status more vulnerable in 2012 than any other year?
Don’t get me wrong, I like an excuse to eat candy and mock cheesy cards as much as anyone. That aspect of V-day is cutesy and fun and something the perpetual first grader in me still appreciates.
Cool project. Post this if you dare , I call a spade a spade mate.
“Being from Wichita, Kansas, I had a chance to see the success that Tulsa has had from the early 1980′s with all the great coaches that have coached here – starting with Nolan Richardson and continuing with Tubby Smith, Bill Self and others. I’m excited because of the fact that people in the community are very, very strong in supporting Tulsa basketball.”
*we met new tri delt friends
Not a lot of people know about Whit Stillman, which is truly a cryin' shame because his films are absolutely hilarious. Not only are his depictions of preppy NYC yuppies hysterical, Stillman really created an entirely new style of dialogue that I feel like some movies/television have kind of ripped off. His fast paced, epigrammatic dialogue has heavily influenced Noah Baumbach (whose film Kicking and Screaming is often described as Whit Stillman-esque), Wes Anderson, and even the characters on Gilmore Girls (okay maybe not, but listen to Rory...she sounds just like Audrey from Metropolitan!)
Why there is so little footage of the three of them together is a mystery, but the rest of the film tracks them as independent artists, providing impressionistic snapshots of their respective biographies and aesthetic principles. All of this is loosly organized around an even more vague Platonic idea of what it means to be a guitar player. I suppose this is supposed to become evident by way of synergistic connections, themselves achieved by the editing. I can't say this big picture ever came into view for me.
I have been wanting to make a mix berry oatmeal version as well but the carrot cake variation won so this later one will come to the blog very soon as well, so stay tuned.
Text ~ front & inside done on PC
And Oggie chose to leave it in school to share with his friends, which made me very happy - just the fact that it is something he made (with my help, of course) and the fact that he wanted to share it with his friends. It showed me that he feels some connection with his friends at school and feels comfortable enough to want them to experience the joy of his creation.
“He maketh me to lie down in green pastures. He leadeth me beside the still waters. He restoreth my soul.” (from the 23rd Psalm of David)
Literally crazy in this one.
K - Kids: 5 4 on earth and 1 in heaven
Piper contends that too many Christians have twisted the Gospel, conforming to the surrounding culture of self-love. They reduce the love of the Gospel to a natural human love, which, in our day and age, is “making much of me.” They celebrate what God has done because God makes much of human beings. Christ became like US to free US and to bring US to glory. In a different light, Piper contrasts it to what he sees as the true love and true end of the Gospel: the savoring of the glory of God. It is a paradoxical, challenging love that allows suffering, spiritual warfare, calls for deep repentance, and high sanctification. This love is “doing whatever you need to do to help people see and savor the glory of God in Christ forever and ever. Love keeps God central” (153).
With each passing day, grace becomes more and more alive to those who are willing to cast all of their life on Jesus who can and does what we can’t and won’t. Grace. A sweet word. A sweet sound.
Wow, has it really been over 2 months since I've posted? Oops! Busy doesn't even begin to describe December and January for me!
Carchemish; you will see what the unconquerable Babylonian King Nabonidus and
25 blogs
Later in his career, Reiser switched from the No. 27 to the No. 7, perhaps to rid himself of whatever bad luck the extra "2" held.
Wisdom is when the two combine to form a known alliance,
985 *D-IX/20/1987. “On the Judging of Judges: The Bork Case.” (With Leon Despres and Jamie Kalven.) K.A.M.-Isaiah Israel Congregation, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1990(4), above, pp. 1150-57.)
messages. Mr. Okah then spoke to President Jonathan in
I used the same image on a smaller scale and at 50% opacity for the inside, along with a computer my own greeting- kinda ties the inside and outside together! A strip of the flowered paper (which qualifies it for the Crazy For Challenges- Use Flowers Challenge:) and some Poppy paper cut with the Open Scallop Border die from MFT and it was done!
We invoke you, queen immortal!
Stop trying to draw my attention away from more important matters.
I need to push myself–go somewhere new, explore. You should too.
... well, okay. Not ALL the books.
My mind was racing, I had arranged a bank holiday break with my daughter but the BNP and COUNTRY needed us so I started making the calls.
I don't know if it is pinterest overload or what, but these roller shades just aren't doing it for me in the kitchen. While I am happy that this little project inspired literally thousands of people (and by the way, I wasn't the first one to do this), I am ready to move on. This is the good thing about not spending a lot on home improvements. If you change your mind, ahem, then the cost is minimal to shift gears later.
05 Moonlight Dancin' On A Bayou 05:29
However, the problem with embracing “craft beer”, whether real or non-real, is that you then have to make subjective judgments as to what qualifies. If Timothy Taylors, a respected, long-established small family brewer, started making a non-nitro keg version of Landlord, would that be craft? Or Black Sheep, a very successful new brewery, albeit one whose cask beers are sometimes thought a little dull? And, if not, why not? How are those beers different in kind from keg Jaipur IPA? And, if keg Landlord, why not keg 6X, or keg Pedigree?
The study….
Time to take a break from Christmas cards and show you a little something for Halloween. The cat in the pumpkin stamp is a design by Gary Robertson and is called Cat in the Jack (E1842). I colored the pumpkin with some Faber-Castell markers, cut out the cat/pumpkin, and layered it on top of a circle I cut from cream paper. I edged the circle with a little Scattered Straw Distress Ink just to give it a little dimension. For the background, I stamped the Clouds Cover a card background with black Versafine ink onto grey cardstock to create a night scene. To create the ground, I just added a piece of plain grey paper that I edged with some Pumice Stone Distress Ink. Finally, I added the Purr-fectly Frightful saying (B5479).
Were born, and die soon, within a
Dr. Brian Baird is a six-term member of Congress, social scientist and licensed psychol­ogist. In Congress, he focused on science and technology, energy, health care, oceans, foreign policy, fiscal discipline and Congressional integrity. Prior to his service in Con­gress, he worked as a Ph.D. psychologist in clinical and academic settings. He also taught for more than fifteen years at the university and community college levels.
But a major vampire war is looming, and her brother Sam is still out there, kidnapped by Samantha. The evil Kyle, too, now wielding the mythical Sword, is still on the warpath, and he will stop at nothing to wipe out New York. Caitlin, despite her new home, and despite her finding a new love interest in the elusive vampire Blake, knows that she can only stay on this island for so long before her destiny calls. After all, she is still the One, and all eyes still look to her to find her father and the other weapon that might save them all.
Of the 12 beasts representing years in the Chinese calendar, the one not biologically related to any creature on Earth
I can remember the first movie I ever saw one as a kid, in the theater that is. It was a double feature: The Rescuers in combo with Grease, the original. It was 1977. I was 5 years old. My dad took me and I think I was wearing some kind of jumper. For some reason, whenever I had a really good time as a kid I always remember what clothes I wore. Maybe because I wanted to underscore those moments with a big yellow highlighter pen in my brain. Maybe it was the future writer in me.
I'm not talking about being published, though, of course, that would likely have to happen first. And I'm not talking about book sales, though, naturally, that would be nice, too.
Council Member Letitia James and Attorney Jed Marcus Support the Green Fort Greene & Clinton Hill Initiative, a ‘Greening Businesses and Community’ Project Underway within the 35th Council District
$50-110k a year, reduce to 5% individual, 5% employer (10% total, plus)
That brioche tart did pull the memory out of her heart.
There are going to be many match making features which can be used however, these aren’t all the time such a needed software but there are some tools which are straightforward to make use of and fast to make use of also. These features or tools might be based mostly on a profile which you fill out or a primary ‘wish list’ which you possibly can fill in when you sign up to the site. In case you are not choosy then these profiles might be an ideal assist to you which will be usually profiles which might be a possible match to you by method of e mail through the positioning who believes you two might be a perfect match. There are lots of sites which will enable you however some sites won’t go through this observe, it could rely upon the positioning and if you happen to choose to go for these fast matches. At the end of the day nevertheless, it is still your determination whether you wish to met one another.
I really tried, I really cared.
1. The streaming quality is not as great as SOLIVE. The stream will occasionally stall, but the video quality is decent.
I know there is so much I am missing, but it'll be alright. I've got BIG things going on in this house o' mine. Some crafty dafty home projects that I am super excited about. AND, I finally got on Pinterest, but I haven't been able to play around much on it yet. Can't wait to do that!
When you are done, take a deep breath and return to your regular activities.
Until a few high speed routes, already operational. Travel from Turin to Milan is easy and the cesana italy accommodation and the romantically rugged landscape of the cesana italy accommodation, exhibiting the cesana italy accommodation to those who want to buy a property for sale in Italy, that is well-understood in the cesana italy accommodation and the cesana italy accommodation from Milan to Rome will be spoiled for choice.
unequalled.” Its “water-dripping song” is justly celebrated.
I knew, however, that I wasn't going to hack it as a "real" EMT when I discovered the concept of triage. Our book said the concept originated with the French, and the translation of the word was "to sort." I was horrified by the idea that I'd be responding to some major disaster and have to determine who would get help and who would have to wait, and really, who was beyond help and would have to be passed over. The idea has stuck with me, and while I'm not responding as an EMT, my life often feels like a constant triage.
(in no particular order)
From all appearances it was good for sailing, but all is not as it appears. I am reminded of Proverbs 14:12. “There is a way that seemeth right unto a man, but the ends thereof are the ways of death.”
This is a very quick card that I made to mail off to my daughter who is in Quebec. She loves dogs so I knew that this would be a perfect stamp to use! It is called Friendly pup. The sentiment and birdie are from the clear set Mi Casa. Both are by Hero Arts.
All of a sudden, pain racked his body. He felt as though he was being ripped in two. His skin burned and his insides felt like they were being devoured by countless small ants. His head felt like someone was constantly smashing his skull with a sledge hammer and each beat of his heart sent searing-white pain racing through his veins.
The Financial Times posts "The Analysts React" but the bottom line is that they probably don't have anybody who knows what's going to happen. Still, let me drop a quote or two, from Kit Juckes at Societe Generale, if you can't read that piece.
...What was the sheen like on the shell? Is the “foot” ragged or smooth? Does the shell crack like a baby bird’s egg? (Okay, that last one is my professional contribution, but it’s important, no??)
He allows the “optimists” their say and acknowledges that the West faces a genuine dilemma in forming a judgment about such a big, baggy movement which speaks with many voices. Though he remains a skeptic, he provides a wealth of information to let the rest of us make up our minds. He explains how in the 1950s a small, tightly knit band of Brothers successfully transplanted the movement to Europe. Led by Said Ramadan, the son-in-law of the Brotherhood’s Egyptian founder, these pioneers turned Geneva and Munich into the hubs of a network of mosques and institutions lubricated with Saudi funding.
05 - With A Little Help From My Friends
Is to stand
But this recipe - it's my answer to a day that was too too crazy. I spent my morning dashing around all over, my afternoon dragging myself to different lessons, and dinner? Done quickly and easily with this recipe. It's the tastiest stir fried chicken I've ever eaten and while I was eating I thought to myself, something this easy shouldn't be this good. But it is. And so easy. And - Daughters and Son LOVED it. Gobbled it, rubbed the sauce all over their rice and chewed it down.
We are taken to the Buddhist temple which, we are told, was destroyed by the Japanese in the Great Patriotic War and later destroyed by the Americans in the Korean War, but which the Party had faithfully re-built twice. The one monk on display seemed a little sad-eyed and the temple’s official guide seemed a little more over-zealous than most on unsubtly pushing the Party line.
If you want to see it personally, it is also available in specialty and department stores, including Nordstrom, Bloomingdales, Saks Fifth Avenue, and other children's boutiques in the U.S., Canada and Australia.
I wonder just a bit
4 days that were 0 or below for the lows
(5) Eumeah Smith Ozene Benoit
Plan In Advance: You can’t really call up your buddies on a Friday night and expect them to be free Saturday afternoon. Plan a week or two in advance or have a fixed schedule that everybody’s aware of (‘the first Friday of every month’ or ‘every other Sunday afternoon’), and that way people are more likely to be able to make it.
“We aim to to sow the seeds of a successful writing career by helping writers achieve the coveted status of a 'published author'”.
Out came my burger and fries, and it was absolutely perfect. Cooked to a nice medium, perfectly seasoned, topped with Provolone cheese and some onions. You could tell the beef was nice, and had just enough fat in it to keep it juicy and tasty. The bun was fresh with a nice crusty outside, and a nice soft inside. These were obviously baked fresh, and probably delivered daily. The fries were nice thick cut steak fries that you see at a lot of places, and they accompanied the burger well.
Julie posted on her blog just yesterday morning, HERE ,with excitement about the progress on her daughter's adoption papers and their upcoming trip to the US on May 15th. Julie and Timmy made a different trip and are in God's presence today. Life is fragile.
“How come Spiderman gets to play with Batman anyway? I never knew they were friends.” I feel the tension in my arm melt. It begins to lower as he awkwardly folds his 6 foot frame down next to mine. Relief cools my skin. I realised then that I’d been sweating.
I know myself, and I would spend upwards of a half hour ridding you of every! last! spot! no matter what it took! to the exclusion of all else, while the rest of the dishes sat undone, dishwater growing cold, with me, irritated at interruptions to my single-minded quest. Instead, I'm doing the rest of the dishes, putting you all away cozy in your cabinets, and spending time with my guys.
State Senator John Whitmire's staff forwarded me the following op ed by the Senate Criminal Justice Coalition Chairman that deserves Grits readers' attention.
The atmosphere was relaxed and happy, with plentiful seating, good DJs, very friendly organisation which I'll mention under 'hospitality', good lighting with minor flaws, and a lot of good dancers who were thoroughly pleased to be there. The gorgeous weather didn't do it any harm; walking back at 4am in my little fleece hoodie, it was just pleasantly cool, with visible stars.
"Are you whining?"
“We saw continued strong growth in Germany, encouraging gains in Japan, and growing momentum in Italy,” he said. “Excluding the previously discussed change in our QCard program with GE Capital Retail Bank, our adjusted OIBDA growth would have been up 2 percent, this on top of 8 percent in growth last year. Our eCommerce worldwide revenue grew 19 percent and now represents 30 percent of QVC’s consolidated net revenue. Revenue from new customers grew 29 percent in the U.S., representing our highest growth rate since 2009. QVC remains focused on growing sales and gaining share in the current retail environment by offering differentiated and compelling products, engaging our customers on all the screens and devices they interact with daily, and expanding globally.”
To date, as far as I can determine, no one has been held accountable by the Police Department—from Chief Chalmers down to Gottlieb, and including Linwood Wilson, who has improperly functioned in a law enforcement role. “Accountability,” indeed, sounds like a word the DPD has never encountered.
Notice anything about that list? All the hosts are men. I didn’t fully claim my feminist card until I got to college, but even then, I could tell a startling disparity in the quality of the shows hosted by men and the ones by women (well, actually, one, at the time – Sara Moulton: her show was a little dry, but at least she brought her A-game and got into the boys’ club at Food Network). The men were exciting and fun. They were authorities on their field, and they actually taught me things I didn’t know before.
Leaves me wondering what they take away from here, if anything. And then I wonder about other sites people from around the world land on. And then I worry a little.
This time it must be true because it comes from some genius who teaches at Stanford and writes for the Harvard Business Review. It seems like the gaudier the credentials, the dopier the patter. (Which is stolen directly from one of my all-time favorite lines: Sam Spade, in The Maltese Falcon, by Dashiell Hammett, says: "The cheaper the crook, the gaudier the patter.")
I remained in Portland a couple extra days after the Travel Oregon press trip so that I could visit the brewery. Dewey Weddington, the Vice President of Marketing for SakeOne, personally led me on a tour of the brewery, as well as showing me some of the other sake sights of Portland (which I have previously written about). Dewey was a fine host, personable and down to earth, and he allowed me access to all part of the brewery as well as leading me through a tasting of their domestic sakes.
Cream butter and sugar until light and fluffy or if you're feeling really lazy microwave the butter till melted and then mix in the sugar.
Beau went home with some antibiotics and the vet asked them to return on Saturday morning. They would take x-rays again, and any pneumonia would have started to clear up by then. I spoke with my mom on Tuesday night, and she said Beau had had a rough day, but perked up when my dad came home from work. I figured he was on the upswing to a full recovery.
This will give the government the right to sell access to our private lives to whom so ever they should so choose to sell it to.
It’s like anything, you get used to it. Like jumping into cool water. It’s a shock at first, but then you even things out and it feels okay. At work, they changed a site I work with a lot. When I first started using it, I found a task had become frustrating and tedious. I had to move through 500 names, 10 at a time, waiting each time for the system to bring up the next names. Doing this task, I would get bug-eyed and feel like I was falling asleep waiting for it. But after doing it a couple hundred times, I’ve gotten used to it. It no longer feels so tedious and difficult. I believe this is the process of transmutation.
Family feuds are something else the author deals with very well and you get to realize that this is not just ‘some family feud,’ such petty family wars take place in almost every family. The vulnerability of a parent’s life gets to be felt when one slips into late teens when one realizes that parents are not as strong as they seem to be:
In this article I have not sought to prove that President Obama was not born in America, I have no way of knowing whether he was or was not. To be honest I find the birth announcements in the 1961 Hawaiian newspapers hard to dismiss, whereas, on the other hand I can not believe that anyone would spend so much money in order to keep his original birth certificate private if there wasn't something to hide. I also find that the recent “peek-a-bo” release of images of the president's passport to be very suspicious and rather suggestive of desperation.
I really chuckled when I read the judges comments, because if you remember I felt kinda bewildered after reading the comments from Va Quilt Fest. But thankfully, these judges gave both compliments as well as suggestions for improvement,... like on Blaze, here are two of the comments: 1) Scale of quilting is perfect for the design of the quilt, and 2) When using flange on a quilt try to make sure it is the same size all around the quilt. Boy, I couldn't agree more and remember considering taking off the binding when I first finished the piece to try and fix the piping. Compare those two comments to the comments from the Va show: 1) Your quilting was all the same size, flattening the otherwise very daring composition., and 2) Like the use of piping. So I guess as the saying goes, take a judges comments for what they are worth and move on :-).
2. Notes Towards a Definition of Culture. T.S.Eliot
A must-have book for all vampire fans, A Brief History of Vampires charts the phenomenal craze of ‘popular vampires’ such as Nosferatu and Count Dracula to screen vampires such as those played by Bela Lugosi and Robert Pattinson. With the current global vampire craze taking the book, film and TV charts by storms with the Twilight saga and True Blood, this book begs the question: why do we love to be frightened?
No, Ron Brown shouldn’t be fired. He should quit. He works for a school that welcomes homosexuals as equals. Which means he’s being paid by people who don’t share his moral values. He’s living a lie. He should retire from football and campaign full-time for our right to fire each other purely for being gay.
Ariana, caught in a deadly battle of her own, is neither the soulless creature Kougar believes her to be, nor the savior he seeks. And when darkness threatens to annihilate both races, the greatest danger of all becomes the glorious love Kougar and Ariana once shared. A love that must never rise again. A love that has never died.
Good Luck and Happy Stitching!
You SUCK!
The black dot turned out to be a skylight 35 meters across leading into a cavern below. The cavern is likely a lava tube located beneath the surface of the volcano. Based on the shadow, the floor is about 20 meters below the skylight.
This morning proved to be a chaotic one around here...after double checking weather.com I decided to take the chickens outside in the back yard to enjoy the day for a bit (have a mentioned we got chickens? Yes...me...the anti pet, clean freak has CHICKENS in the basement...I am growing or something) I got them all outside and came back in to get dinner in the crock pot while I watched them out the back window and it began to POUR buckets of rain. The chickens were all over, and it is well known that I am tentative about the chickens...the kids desperately wanted them, Howard wanted them, and I know I need to let go and let the kids experience these things, so we are giving chicken raising a shot, but chicken WRANGLING was not something I imagined for myself! :) But here I was running all over in the pouring rain catching chickens and putting them in a Rubbermaid bin to get them back to their cozy pen in the basement. I came in, soaking wet, put the chickens in the pen and the phone rang...
I've been meaning to tell you about a new friend I have.
CHASING BROOKLYN was a RITA FINALIST 2011, and is a Missouri Gateway nominee.
My foes will be terrified and disgraced; all will fall back in sudden shame. Psalm 6
And told him
The final item was a package of Planet Organic Soba Noodles. I’ve never tried soba noodles, but have heard only good things about them. Not only did Lauren send me some, but she was sweet enough to include a recipe for soba noodles with kale and walnuts. I haven’t had the chance to try it yet (I haven’t been out to get the kale and walnuts) but I did try the noodles tonight with some ingredients I had on hand, and made a killer meal for dinner!
12:30-1:15 Lunch
That should result in a Republican White House and Senate next year and a Democratic House, but it won’t because we aren’t as smart as European voters. Most voters don’t actually vote about what really concerns them at all; they will vote for the incumbent either because it’s the only name they recognize, or because the incumbent has been reminding them of how many federal dollars and favors he has been able to “bring home.”
“What’s it say?”
Procrastination rarely (if ever) makes the task easier.
"Do you have any hot needles for my eyeballs?"
Let me say now that I've never been able to teach myself an off loom technique by using a book. Usually I try and then go take a class so I can see how to do it. I wanted to use beads from my stash and I didn't have any 6mm rounds to use so I substituted with size 6 and size 8 seed beads. So it was a little harder to see the beads and pattern.
I hope seeing a glimpse at the ladies behind the barre has made you want to come try a class – I am literally here 4-5 times a week so ping me and we will rock it at the barre together!
I'll start to spend my money
man’s story
“I’m having a graduation party. We hadn’t spoken in a while, so I didn’t have a chance to give you an invitation.” He said. He pulled one out from his backpack and gave it to me. I promised him that I would go.
As far as I know, Mary is the only one of the twelve to have stayed in Belfast, or in Ireland at all, for that matter. The remainder spent the better part of their lives in England, or for a short time, Scotland (Josie worked at Butlin’s holiday camp outside Ayr.)
Have you ever watched as it changed,
*If you do feel some kind of way about cotton, I won’t hold it against you, I’m a little sensitive about the history of it in the U.S. myself…(tee hee).
And here's the original sketch I did of him some 10 or 12 years ago. Not sure why it took me so long to get around to drawing him up proper.
11. My mother taught me: WEATHER.
It’s long past time that the American people wised up to the liberal demagogic attacks and understood that liberal policies hurt minorities, hurt women, hurt the young and hurt the poor FAR more than the conservative policies that liberals constantly demonize.
3. She who controls the cookie, controls the game. Don’t allow a man to unclasp your, um, cookie jar, until he has earned the right to. The Sex in the City three date rule before sex is tossed on it’s ear. You shouldn’t invite a man in for a nightcap until the 5th date. If you are serious about a man and want him to be serious about you, make him wait 90 days for sex. Most employers make you go through a probation period (usually 90 days) before you get benefits. Same idea.
2.) The new trim added to the curtains made them even more captivating and interesting.
Schucks
The final point I should make is that Brookfield is writing for an American environment from 1995. That said, I suspect that many of the suggestions he makes would transfer comparatively smoothly to a UK classroom, and (apart from one joking references to overheads) I didn’t notice any suggestions about using technology that would make the book unusuable or superceded – it’s aged remarkably well. So I shall look forward to trying out some of Brookfield’s recommendations, and I shall see how far it gets me.
‘a fighting organisation of the bourgeoisie, an organisation that rests on the active support of social democracy which is the moderate wing of fascism.’
7) In the popular idiom, a general strike is as old as the hills, or at least as old as the hills of Rome. According to H.G. Wells, the first general strike properly took place in Rome by the lowly plebeians. The plebeians “saw with indignation their friends, who had often served the state bravely in the legions, thrown into chains and reduced to slavery at the demand of patrician creditors.” For veterans of the Iraqi or Afghanistan wars this might sound eerily familiar. In the U.S., one of the first general strikes was the infamous Railroad Strike of 1877. This was, in infancy, the beginning of a nascent labor movement showing its muscle across the nation, culminating ultimately in the May 1, Haymarket strikes and riots that led to the weekend, child labor laws, and the 8 hour day. The typeface is just a reminder how far things have come, and sadly, how far we still have to go. What this poster delivers in simple type face is almost as important as the message itself: We’ve been here before.
Posted: 1:13 AM, September 11, 2009
In the ‘80s and ‘90s, homeschooling pioneers fought for the right to direct their children’s educations. And they got good results, too. The original predictions of warped, antisocial children didn’t seem to pan out, and the early generations of homeschooled kids turned out as well-educated (if not better) than the average public schoolchild.
edit to post~ I forgot to bling the tree, so I changed the close up pic, which now has bling!!
43. Teaching me to drive a standard... I swear, you have the patience of Job.
Though either way, I noticed I’m not much into otome gaming lately even if my miyako FD(I love the ED xD) and Atelier Elkrone came, I barely passed the prologue in atelier then moved on to miyako… finishing ichigou, genshin, seimei and nigou’s and I could barely give a crap on it—not to mention that I haven’t played my most faves, Izumi and Raikou; I liked Douman but I don’t know why I can’t bring the bloody crap to get over his route.
I thought of Johns' cross-hatch paintings from the 1970s, including his famous Corpse and Mirror which hangs in The Art Institute of Chicago. The formalist grid of painting, that high minded center of modern art, is deconstructed, taken apart, and manipulated in a way that tempts order without ever finding it. Irwin’s line and dot paintings accomplished this feat in the 1960s, and this new work, in my mind, does a similar thing. The piece exists simply as Irwin’s negotiation of light for our benefit, his ability to create an experience that surprises you and does not allow your experiential expectations. Johns’ painting does a similar thing – the things you think you know are not as clear cut as you thought. However, Johns’ work never bursts into soft light. We go to Irwin for that.
22. I Like Beer -- Tom T. Hall
I feel very calm, relaxed, and mellow
It has traded between 4.10p – 5.10p in recent months, around a 15-25% return every 2 – 3 weeks. Not bad in my eyes! With a new low support at 3.9p (it did hit 3.3p but for about 30mins, jumped straight back up no problem). It finished around here on friday, and monday, before rising to 61.8% fibs of 4.55p. Im looking for a bounce off 3.9p very early next week. If it crosses support i’ll wait and see if a new support is formed in a month or so.
Hey Diva's! It's Another Great Super Saturday and I have been enjoying it just chillaxn w/ the Family! Today starts a New Challenge Week over @ My Sheri Crafts and we are Super Excited about it. In addition to Valentine's Day coming up, February is also Heart month! SO this weeks Challenge we are asking for you to Show Love! Love your Valentine, love your Heart and let's see at least two Hearts on your project!
みなおやすみなさい
Smoke on the water
As regular readers will know, my dad was a sergeant in the British Army for 11 years, but never saw active duty—never fought in a battle, never killed a man. Perhaps this may account for his fascination all his life with things military and biographies about men like Churchill, Hitler and many books about battles. This goes a long way to explain our family trip to Europe in 1977 which took in as many battle sites as possible. (Some fun for a 16 year old girl, let me tell you!)
There’s a quote from Memory, Sorrow, and Thorn by Tad Williams – where a character notes that in the name of knowledge an evil priest pursued intellectual avenues (and magical) that essentially twisted him by exposing him to malevolent powers, and he pronounces such methods as very unwise as basically it is:
She said that she doesn't fear her baby growing up and starting smoking in adulthood - but she is in absolute terror that he may fall victim to illegal drugs which the Govt is doing nothing about.
a paint stirrer or popsicle stick
Iberdrola Acquires El Andevalo Wind Farm For $440 Million From Gamesa 11
PAIR OF NEW TVIEW T718DVPL-TAN HEADRESTS WITH 7″ TFT CAR MONITORS BUILT IN + BUILT IN DVD/CD/MP3/DIVX PLAYER + BUILT IN FM MODULATOR + IR TRANSMITTER + USB INPUT AND SD CARD READER + 2 REMOTES + 2 YEAR WARRANTY
Loughner is being held without bail, and without access to Retro TV.
of the needs of the youths.
Now, keep heading straight on through and eventually you will reach street level again. Once you reach the end of the street, you can make a right back into Forest Park and after going under the bridge make another right which will lead you back to Steinberg Skating Rink. This loop is somewhere between 3 and 4 miles, night and day friendly, well policed I would say, and not hilly whatsoever.
& as soon as I get the call she's sick
The Senate has effectively been in recess for weeks, and is expected to remain in recess for weeks.
Micah - Don't pass gas
If we are to get the nation back to health and towards a sustainable future it is important to take a look at the historical roots and structure of South Africa's current disease. We cannot accept simplistic ideological solutions designed for other times and other countries.
* Keratin Conditioning Mask Treatment
The illustrations reflect diversity within Native America by including characters who're also of European and African-American heritage. In fact, it's one of the few books reflecting Black Indian characters wherein their ethnicity is incorporated without commentary.
I loved exchanging scurrilous anecdotes about colleagues. I learned that one Ottakar's manager regularly had pyjama-party sleepovers in her shop, whilst another had stolen enough money to buy a sports car (he ended up in prison). But my favourite gossip was about authors. I learned that Jilly Cooper was lovely but Jeffrey Archer was deeply unpleasant, whilst Terry Pratchett could be very grumpy, only turning on the charm for his fans.
Little Bear is a drama queen. She loves to role play and will stay in her chosen role for a very long time (this from the child with the attention span of a gnat). She will have very long and detailed 'conversations' of which we only ever hear her half and it is clear from her responses that the other 'person' is saying or asking some very complicated things. It is quite incredible to listen to her.
Can you explain it to me?"
Years ago, publishers used to grow authors. When authors reached a certain number of books in print, the publisher would have a huge marketing campaign to break the author out into the mainstream and hit the bestseller lists. That's how a lot of NYT bestsellers got there.
This article is a little uncharacteristic for me, as I like optimism, especially about Pakistan. However, the views expressed by Sherry Rehman and Hafeez Sheikh in particular border on denial of the current state of affairs. Problems aren’t fixed by ignoring them. Anyway, that is enough grim stuff for now, it was still fun to get to see policy makers in action while being so far from home, and there were a few good takeaways too. I hope this article gets us on our way, Emad is off from class this summer and will return home so will have more time to write, and my harassing will certainly help him get out of his rut. Umair I see every week, so he better write soon. Those two are far better writers and too intelligent to not have their voices heard.
Enter yourself in the sweepstakes to win a KINDLE FIRE. There's nothing wrong with adding the occasional material gift to your Hope Chest, after all.
materials. What's nice about this room is that it can be easily
CONTEMPORARY ANARCHIST STUDIES
We have heard no more shooting for 30 minutes now. If it was a confrontation between troops and protestors, I suspect the demonstration was broken up and that things will remain quiet now that night has fallen. Tomorrow is a holiday (International Workers Day in most of the world, but African Unity Day in Mali) so schools will be out of session and most offices will be closed.
olive oil for brushing rolls
Darren
They contradict each other, also, in regard to the place of these apparitions; for Matthew says that it was in Galilee, upon a mountain; Mark says that it was when they were at table; Luke says that He brought them out of Jerusalem as far as Bethany, where He left them by rising to Heaven; and John says that it was in the city of Jerusalem, in a house of which they had closed the doors, and another time upon the borders of the Tiberian Sea.
The river and the park, set in a large grove of trees, was exceptional for the Prairies, and made an appealing setting for a picnic. It was like the gathering of a large family there. Some were enticed to come who only seldom attended church .
second one was elegance,
Humph. How mean is that?
Too Much Pussy! Feminist Sluts, a Queer X Show 2010 Documentary Movie Watch Online Full Movie
A theme running through a lot of the presentations is that there is still a good number of questions to entertain the CJEU in relation to this "wretched regulation". This was graphically illustrated by Patricia Cappuyns (Olswang), who noted that even courts in the same territory (the lively jurisdiction of Belgium in this case) can "politely disagree" on the interpretation of the regulation, never mind courts in different jurisdictions.
4 – Iced tea. As noted in my #3, I’ve had to recently purchase new tea flavors and when I found the new one, I wasn’t sure if it would work iced. I mean, it tastes delicious when it’s hot, but we had a really warm day and I didn’t want hot tea, so, I experimented with it cold… oh my goodness! It tastes just as good cold… okay, well, it’s definitely better when it’s hot but it’s not too shabby iced. I’m liking it. I’m actually almost on my third pitcher of it!
The fan shell that makes up her chair is one of the ones that we found on a beach walkabout. They are such delicate shells and I love when I find them whole. The sand on the base is my own mixture. (it makes great snow too...you know...that funny COLD white stuff that some places get)
2 medium carrots, chopped
The next encounter with wild animals was not far off. About 30 minutes later, I heard a massive crashing around the corner. I continued cautiously on the path to be surprised by 3 mountain goats! Two of them were younger and the older was a female that had no horns. The jumped down the side of the cliff as if it were stairs.
The photo above shows the scene in front of my house as of yesterday. That has all come out of my basement and there is more to come. Again, I just keep reminding myself how lucky I am compared to the entire rest of my town. Though I live right across the street from the Susquehanna River my part of Front Street is just a slightly higher elevation than most of the rest of town. The houses behind me on Main street have water half way up. Many houses will have to be bulldozed. I'm still trying to get my head around this idea - that this has happened in my hometown - to my friends and neighbors. My heart just keeps breaking.
But. I was vegan from around the age of 19 to the age of 30 or so, and then again in fits and starts through my 30s. My path away from veganhood was a complicated mixture of changing feelings and experiences with death, difficult pregnancies (and kid(s) who had allergies, difficulty eating, and/or difficulty gaining weight), and perspective. My primary reason for being a vegan then is the same as my primary reason for being vegetarian: aesthetically, meat grosses me out. I had a hard time with eggs before eggs became a necessary option for me and/or my kids. But also–I just didn’t like the idea of things dying.
I love when my over 6 foot tall boyfriend picks me up, or gives me a piggy back because it brings my perspective from that of 5 feet tall, to a full foot higher. I can see the tops of people's heads, I can see over the crowd, and all this without my calves burning from standing on my tippy toes! We all have different perspectives, and sometimes it can be exciting seeing life at someone else's viewpoint.
You know how it is. You’re enjoying yourself, kicking back and relaxing at the pub or maybe at the library; or maybe you’re in class or just casually surfing the internet, indulging in a little conversation. The topic of the conversation is about a pertinent contemporary issue, probably something to do with a group of people who fall outside your realm of experience and identity. They’re also probably fairly heavily discriminated against - or so they claim.
on, but that he could not discuss them until they had
Will try to update again tomorrow,
6:55: Can’t maintain an erection? Don’t take a pill, just stopping being a sissy and act like a man! RAWR! Steaks and lasers and uppercuts and explosions! So is being a “bro” basically just living perpetually in a Michael Bay movie?
- Daniel S.
I’m back from my lovely weekend in Brooklyn. Our time was spent eating, drinking and socializing. It was great to have a weekend in New York with no big agenda for sight-seeing. I was toted around by friends and didn’t even step foot in Manhattan. Refreshing really!
oh, and a sandbox.
Finally able to work out again after having my stomach virus come back. Those bugs just don’t seem to go away for a long time. Only nice thing about this virus is losing weight.
The definite keepers that I got out of the 5 were these two. The Neil Walker is a 2011 Topps Opening Day blue parallel that I needed for my master set which is currently stalled a bit. I still need a little less than half of the blues and 1 Toppstown to have a complete master set (including the autos). The other keeper is a 1979 Topps Eddie Murray 2nd year card. I still need Murray's 78 for my rookie cup collection, this one is pretty sweet as well and will be helpful once I decide to build the 1979 set at some point (possibly next year).
She loves to play ball too, she never gets tired of that.
(Note: Rem is a unit of ionizing radiation equal to the amount that produces the same damage to humans as one roentgen of high-voltage x-rays. Source: MIT)
Fourth, I was inspired by a picture on a street fashion website to try braiding my bangs back. I haven’t cut them since November and they are getting a bit out of control. I’m debating whether I want to try a longer bang style or cut them again. In the meantime, I thought I'd try fringeless existence. I feel like it ages me a little (because you can see all my forehead wrinkles). I also feel like my face is freaking huge without the curtain of hair.
the most dreadful harrows of bad boozing,
- He is moving into taking two naps a day.
Tile: $927.32 From a local retailer called the Floor Club. Floor tile: Bambu "Grigio", Glass/Marble accent tile: Eclipse "Eternity"
Not only the PPP but also the United States remained adamant that the Judiciary could not be restored (don’t know on what grounds) but when there is the will of people, there is no stopping and PPP had to finally bow down to public pressure and did what they never wanted to.
And then we'll do some science. And art. And math. And other stuff. (Can you see my blatant bias?)
I had DBT today and I was very anxious about attending group due to what transpired last week. Instead of doing what I wanted to do and stay home, I got up when I was supposed to and went to group. I did a mini prior to heading to group. I counted my breath for 5 breaths and then chose to go to group, knowing this was the right choice to make.
So, as I mentioned, I am off today and staying home to take it easy. Sort of. So far today I have done three loads of laundry. Gone to the county's treasury office and purchased our county tags and the dog's license. Gone to the grocery store. Unpacked and put away the groceries purchased at the grocery store. Picked up and straightened up around the house from where the hubby has been home alone, and while he tries, he just doesn't seem to be able to put things back where he finds them. Surfed the web a little, and, made my Mom's rice pudding.
Still what was on show was good and included a group of Morris dancers. Of course I took lots of photos, including this little boy, who I think from the look on his face, has had enough on sitting on his dad's shoulders, as he had been doing it for around thirty minutes.
The Cyberman are a bit of a let down in this story. They act like zombies, showing no real intelligence. They seem to take their orders from a computer. Their metal faces looking strangely happy. Their vulnerability of the week is to artificially induced fear.
And we even had a fire evac in our building this morning (there was smoke in one of our lab locations downstairs, so we had to call in the sexay, sexay fire team from down the street and get everyone out for a bit...), and it STILL is a pretty darned good day.
I continued. I shared with hubby, whom I might add appeared to be losing interest by this time, that when I was a little girl and had to go with my mom to her lady's church meetings, that I entertained myself by studying the shoes of the ladies in attendance. Afterward, I could identify every woman present by the shoes she was wearing. I must also confide to you that I was very judgmental about many of those ladies solely based on the style and condition of her shoes. I thought to have shared this with hubby, might not have been in my best interest at the time.
3. That said allegations are true and correct of my own personal knowledge;
Starting something new, even a new hobby, is sometimes overwhelming. Especially when you walk into an already established world that you didn't know existed. Talk about intimidating.
The latter part of your questions, branding Albanians as Islamists talks about the idea for “Satanisation” of the Albanian pro-Western politics. The Albanian politics has always been and will always be pro-Western. That is why the strategy for connecting Albanian politics to Islamic fundamentalism and radicalism has been triggered.
Update on my pup Ashley- We have decided that it would be best to give our baby girl to the dog trainer. This dog trainer has changed my look on everything I have ever learned about dogs. She is amazing. I think Ashley will be better off with the dog trainer. She is my baby but the trainer "Jenn" can give her the attention she needs, she will train her, and she is going to give her a purpose in life. Ashley is going to do amazing, Jenn is going to train her and make her into a therapy dog. I was so amazed at Ashley's accomplishments in just two weeks, she listens so well to Jenn the trainer. It's weird to say but I think her and Jenn were made for each other. I am going to miss her tremendously but the trainer said I will still get to see her. I am so excited to see what she can do with Ashley. I think this will be best for her, my life is so busy right now with school and the deployment, I never imagined that having a "Gladiator" breed would be so hard. We were prepared to keep Ashley until she died but I think it will be best this way, and I am saving her life.
Source: My Library
but fear not we shall all continue to stalk her in blogland.
There you have 5 easy ways to simply take something you do each day and use it to learn and fill your files! No extra time is needed, other than the time it takes to clip an article and stick it in your file. Mere seconds. What a cinch!
What I am trying to say is that you need to know what you want out of life. You don’t need to be specific but you need to know if you would be happy being a workaholic, or do you need some down-time? I guess that is what kept me from applying to a million reach schools… knowing that while it is an honor to be accepted into such a renowned school, I would never be happy because I need something in my life that is not academic.
Plus my camera broke.
Spoon the sauce onto the pineapple.
The little girl sees the stack of bonds, admires their ornate design, and decides they would make beautiful wallpaper for her doll house. So she takes them, having no idea of their value. The girl’s actions (unlikely, but hardly implausible) then trigger a succession of unlikely (but hardly implausible) events. First, her frantic parents phone the cops, who, though far from the Keystone mould, seem sheepish and deferential to the wealthy couple, and are treated like glorified servants, especially by the wife (Marguerite Marsh), who seems worried about their effect on her carpet. No one thinks to question the little girl.
When contacted about Palash’s allegations, Ram Sampath, composer of the anthem for Aamir’s TV show, said, “I don’t have any idea about what you are saying. Nobody has said anything of this sort to me yet. So, I refuse to comment.”
I can remember walking beans as a boy and you were wet and cold in the morning and then by afternoon wishing you could be wet and cold again for a little relief from the heat.
The screen fades to black.
The article is from “The Press Association.”
Mom made the Wanton in soup as everyone in the family loves them that way – steaming hot, slippery wanton and sesame marinated Wanton aroma from each bite! The preparation was amazingly easy with mom blending pork meat, prawn, sesame oil and soy sauce in a large bowl.
Since independent contractors aren’t covered by most federal employment laws, they don’t enjoy the same legal protections on wages as permanent employees, says a spokesman for the Department of Labor. If a permanent employee doesn’t get paid, federal or state labor departments can fine companies and even prosecute company executives. But independent contractors often have to turn to the court system, in most cases small claims, if they go unpaid.
Rather amazed at the Star Walk app's ability to overlap with what the iPad2's camera sees, I just checked out whether I could possibly see Saturn and Spica (along with the full moon), but no, the moon is much too bright. But it found Mars for me, and some other constellations, and hey, I never have been much interested in stars, constellations, or planets (favoring the on-earth natural world), so it's pulling me in!
In the EU the 3G service is provided by Vodaphone, and the £279 price tag includes a free 4GB memory card, a PAYG SIM card which when topped up with £5 will get you a free downloadable game – WipEout 2048 – and 250 MB of data lasting up to 30 days with full Vodafone 3G connectivity.
What type of homeschool curriculum are you using? How do you get started? How do you find out the legal business behind schooling, so you don't end up in jail for not sending your children to school?
If I had the courage /strength, it would be better all round to end it all now & cut short my distress and suffering. I’m erudite, intelligent, perhaps it would advance the political cause.
Claire remained generally skeptical about the egg-hunting. Like what was the big deal? Why is everyone so excited for me to get my feet sandy and pick up some colored plastic balls? Especially when my big brother will get some for me.
Let’s now take a look at the boat. It was large, having the furnishings for 276 passengers made up of soldiers, sailors and prisoners along with a few (at least two) passengers. We know from the context that Luke and Aristarchus accompanied Paul on the trip.
Back to my narrative, I saw the car hit me and I barely had time to seek for forgiveness before my world went blank. I woke up to find a Rapid Response Police van parked by the wreckage that was now my car, with several policemen trying to figure out what happened. I walked up to one of the policemen and tried to explain what happened, but he was oblivious to my presence… I walked up to another cop but it seemed like I was being ignored. It wasn’t until an ambulance pulled up and I saw a paramedic lifting my lifeless body on to a stretcher and then I heard the paramedic telling one of the policemen that I was already dead. I raised my voice in protest trying to explain that it was rude for them to be talking about me in such a manner particularly in my presence, they couldn’t hear me or they were trying their very best to ignore me I didn’t know what to believe.
A prospective homebuyer walks into a fancy office full of blueprints and schematics. When asked how they can be helped, the prospective buyer places a high-end faucet on the desk and said that he wanted to build a house around it.
Kids bump their heads, when learning to walk the fall down and go boom, they find all kinds of ways to hurt themselves. How you handle it can have an impact on how they see it. For example, if you run over every time your kid trips you will teach him or her to freak out over every little thing.
So do The Cleverlys...
The son of a railway worker, Fang was born on February 12, 1936 in Beijing. While in China, he openly declared he did not believe in Marxism, frequently criticized the Chinese government and questioned the legitimacy of the Chinese Communist Party.
Here are a few shots of the moon taking with this method.
- fruit pies
Can you date new eras in your life based on pivotal books? I can. In fact, I could go on and on, so I’ll break this into two posts. One today and one tomorrow.
I got a baby vampire in me,
As for the products I used, I was very surprised. The Elasta QP conditioner has petrolatum in it but it was still very moisturising and did not weigh my hair down. The African Pride oil also had mineral oil in it and I found it perfect for my hair. My only problem with it was that it was heavily fragranced. I find this case with many hair products, in the bottle it is heavily fragranced but by the time you put it on your hair it usually fades. Not this one. I woke up with my hair smelling like fragrance you have worn for too long. It wasn’t a bad smell, I just did not want my hair to smell like that lol. I did not have a problem with the fragrance of the pomade or any other product, just the oil. I plan to carry on using these products, but if I find an oil that makes my hair feel just as great as the African Pride oil without such a heavy fragrance, I would gladly switch!
You need cauliflower, chickpeas, red bell pepper, mango, golden raisins, roasted cashews, honey or agave syrup, olive oil, curry powder, coriander powder, cumin powder, cayenne and cilantro.
Animals on fur factory farms are fed meat byproducts considered unfit for human consumption. Water is provided by a nipple system, which often freezes in the winter and can also fail because of human error.
I like sitting down and rattling out a big long post talking about something or another, sticking a few photos in, researching a few nonsense facts, and basically pretending to the world that, for some reason or another, I am important because my opinion has a particularly loud enough volume to be recognised as distinct. I think this because my vision is clouded by my addiction to my hitcount.
Silence. I sat there and stared.. who knows how long. And finally I just started to say my thoughts out loud. I talked to her. Some tears were shed yes, laughter was made yes, anger was outbursted yes, memories were brought up yes. But I did it. And in the end it didn't seem as bad as I had made it. And I actually came to a few of my own conclusions. This is my reality and I know it is, yet I wonder if it will ever feel like it's unreal. It's been a year now, and yet it still feels so unreal.
I should be back tomorrow with a card. That's if I ever get one made today!! I just haven't felt like crafting these last few weeks, but I really want to get back into it and I just received a fab dt package from Little Snippets the other day with some extras too (thank you Ger!) and a lovely lovely lady also sent me a gift of some papers, so I am determined to go use some of them and get at least one card made today!! :)
I’ve thought that I really need to blog again, it’s been so long. Blogging for me is so new, I enjoy journaling but throwing my thoughts out here in cyber world sure is different.
The happiest of mediums,
Judging from my reading of this era, the seemed to two completely different sorts of people in China at this time, and they had very little to do with each other. This is perhaps one reason why Chairman Mao decided on his policy of re-education - sending the sophisticated urban intellectuals to experience, at first hand, the extremely hard life of the rural population (although Gao Anhua says it was also to alleviate the urban unemployment).
I don’t want to be that after dinner mint. I hope I don’t have to be that after dinner mint- to become- perhaps my worst fear- gastronomically and viscerally redundant.
“Sanity”
I do sincerely hope you will come on over and join in.
exactly when, but found the lamp still on,
My wife and I decided it was time for her to start reading my novel. Up to this point I have kept it close to my chest. For two reasons. One, she wanted to be able to read the novel in one go. And two, I wanted to get her genuine reaction to the novel after it had been fully re-written and edited.
On the plan:
She used a simple recipe that came with the bread machine that goes as follows.
MATCH #1
But Santa, my dear Santa Claus,
always one’s harsh night eyes over the beerglass
My dog is being a dog and cares little for day to day woes as long as he's fed and loved and has his teddy to cuddle.
Take this pink ribbon off my eyes
When we say that some languages are beautiful and others aren’t, what we’re saying is that we’ve now joined the ranks of fellow well-behaved mirrors. We can now be relied upon to reflect judgements about languages which derive from love, war, and other things that have as much to do with intrinsic features of those languages as a shopping list or a fairy tale. Whether Miss Language is indeed the fairest one of all on its own merits is irrelevant: the reason why the mirror knows best is that we’re looking at it blindfolded.
This is how you order. Pictures of the food and prices are clearly posted. Next time we will eat on this side of the restaurant. The tiki bar was fun, but I'm all about the food, not the drinks, so this is where you will find me.
I'm that mom who follows her passions fully and freely and invites her children along for the ride.
My only warning about this beautiful book? It is sad. Like, I think I cried at least eight times sad. Granted, I am a crier (ask my husband or, uh, maybe don't ask my husband!), but I can't imagine anyone reading this book and not experiencing that swift kick in the gut because you can't help feeling deeply for Aubrey. I fully believe the emotional journey is completely and totally worth it, especially given the overall message of hope and healing offered to the reader. But, when you sit down to devour this book (because you won't be able to put it down) you just might want to have a box of tissues handy. Ahem, real handy.
~ Edna St Vincent Millay
I lowered myself into the tub inch by inch. I had a surprising amount of strength and was able to hover in all sorts of positions before my bottom finally hit the porcelain of the tub. BRRRRR that water was so cold. I hugged my legs to my chest leaving my knees high up in the air. My whole body was shivering. I took a sip of tea and started to push out my feet hoping my knees would follow-another sip of tea-my feet pushed away another centimeter. At this point my knees and most of my legs are still dry, I'm shivering so I pull my hood up and tie it tightly in hopes for a little more warmth. This entire time I am reminding myself that the purpose of this bath is to ice my knees and they are still sitting pretty at 68 degree room temperature. Finally, with a wave of courage I didn't know I had, I pushed my legs out straight and they went under the water. YOW!! It was soooooo cold. I sat there afraid to move, and waited to go numb. Eventually I started to get used to the water, except for my toes, they just never recovered from that snowbank feeling--I lifted them slightly, so that the tips of my toes could poke out of the water. I was starting to settle down and decided to have another sip of tea. I looked to my left and there by the tea cup was the pitcher of ice. I had forgotten to dump it in. Believe me it crossed my mind not to do it, this water was plenty cold, but I went ahead and dumped in the cubes. I dumped them carefully in the corners of the tub, hoping they would be kind enough to stay away from my body. Any time a cube floated near me, I started to swat at it. At some point I realized I was speaking to the ice cubes. I was seriously saying things like "Come on, stay away from me...please." The arctic temps. were getting to me- I was actually pleading with frozen water!!
“Then what do you want?” “I want to become a tiger.” “All right, you become a tiger.” And when he became a tiger, he began to stare his eyes on the saintly person: “I shall eat you.”
15. A Marshall Plan For MENA, looks at the plans of EU Imperialism to incorporate the economies of the Middle East and north Africa, as a wider periphery.
But those which learned scribes disclose
Silver Embossing Powder
Gradually, over time, the unlicensed and increasingly complicated mineworks expand beneath nearly every building in the neighborhood, following two veins of Inwood Marble that track north-south under the city; the buildings, in turn, are propped up by retaining walls and gantries as the quarry swells below.
I use Amy Tangerine paper for the background. I love how the paper is so gorgeous, I barely have to do a thing to it!!! I did add a few strips of washi tape (Love My Tapes) along with a simple, pink button to embellish the card. I think my favorite part is the tiny hearts that I stamped coming from the sentiment...I love using tiny stamps for accents!
The Abys is the world of life and death we jump into as the fool so we can experience all of this glorious beautiful life.
Here is an inside view of my portfolio. I kept it simple. The cards I plan on making to put inside will feature the window die template that I used for the front of the cover. I plan on making a card for each season, Summer, Fall etc.
Somebody has to, Mother replied. The novel is a classic novel-of-ideas, with Auslander freewheeling through a variety of concepts, exploring philosophies and putting his very idiosyncratic spin on them. For all the whimsical, irreverent humour, and its apparently ludicrous central concept, the novel has very serious things to say about the human condition, and humanity’s constant ability to generate hope and optimism despite all the evidence to the contrary. Strip away the jokes and Kugel’s self-flagellating mind-set and the story becomes a very bleak tale of the inevitability of death, and the extent to which hope is a self-deluding folly; and more, a dangerous folly, for there is no depth, the novel warns, to which humanity will not sink.
